Alabama, session 2026rs, SB146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
7 Section 1. The monies in Section 3 are appropriated
8 from the named funds for the 2027 fiscal year to the state
9 agencies indicated, as the amounts to be used to pay the
10 expenditures of the named agencies, and are in lieu of all
11 monies appropriated for these purposes in other sections of
12 the Alabama Statutes.
13 For the purpose of this act, the amounts herein for
14 expenditures are listed by programmatic area and the totals
15 for all programs are shown by the source of funds. It is
16 intended that only the herein named funds be appropriated in
17 the amounts specified to the named agencies and that the
18 following definitions shall be applicable.
19 "Total" shall mean the aggregate total appropriation of
20 all funding sources.
21 "Program" shall mean specific governmental services
22 required to achieve a specific objective. A program shall be
23 directed to meeting the need of an identified clientele, or
24 group of recipients or beneficiaries, and shall be expended
25 only for such purposes.
26 "Capital Outlay" shall mean expenditures which result
27 in the acquisition and/or addition to items, such as land or
Page 1

in the acquisition and/or addition to items, such as land or
SB146 Enrolled
28 buildings, which have an appreciable and calculable period of
29 usefulness in excess of one year, and shall be expended only
30 for such purposes.
31 "Debt Service" shall mean an expenditure for the
32 payment of interest and principal on bonded debt obligations
33 of the State, and shall be expended only for such purposes.
34 "Federal and Local Funds" shall mean all gifts, grants,
35 contributions, or entitlements, including grants by the
36 Congress of the United States, municipalities or counties.
37 Section 2. (a) There is hereby appropriated the amounts
38 set forth herein for the ordinary expenses of the executive,
39 legislative, and judicial agencies of the State, for other
40 functions of government, for debt service, and for capital
41 outlay for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, to be
42 paid out of any monies hereinafter specified, from such other
43 funds and accounts as may be designated, or so much thereof as
44 may be necessary, and the total amount to be expended for the
45 items for which the appropriation is herein made shall not
46 exceed the amount provided therefor, except as provided in the
47 Budget Management Act of 1976, Sections 41-19-1 through
48 41-19-12, Code of Alabama 1975. Provided, however, that
49 regardless of the ending date of any pay period which has been
50 or may be established by the Legislature for the payment of
51 salaries of state employees, the entire payment due shall be
52 made from the fiscal year's appropriation in which the pay
53 date falls.
54 (b) All appropriations made in Section 3 shall be at
Page 2

(b) All appropriations made in Section 3 shall be at
SB146 Enrolled
55 the program level. Any directed expenditure of funds below a
56 program shall be from funds appropriated for the program.
Page 3

program shall be from funds appropriated for the program.
SB146 Enrolled
57 Section 3.
58 State General
59 Fund Other Funds Total
60 A. Legislative Branch:
61 1. Examiners of Public Accounts:
62 (a) Audit Services Program 11,440,704 8,297,871 19,738,575
63 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
64 (1) State General Fund 11,440,704
65 (2) Federal and Local Funds 8,297,871
66 Total Examiners of Public Accounts 11,440,704 8,297,871 19,738,575
67 Transfers from audited agencies to the Examiners of Public Accounts are hereby
68 authorized and shall be appropriated and expended through the fund established by
69 Section 41-5A-22, Code of Alabama 1975. The above appropriation includes funds to
70 complete the annual audit of the Alabama Trust Fund.
71 2. Legislative Council:
72 (a) Legislative Operations and 12,604,076 12,604,076
73 Support Program
74 (1) For debt and operations of 10,000,000
75 the new State House
76 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
77 (1) State General Fund 12,604,076
78 Total Legislative Council 12,604,076 12,604,076
79 3. Legislative Services Agency:
80 (a) Legislative Operations and 4,995,744 280,000 5,275,744
81 Support Program
82 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
83 (1) State General Fund 4,995,744
84 (2) Alabama Administrative Code 180,000
85 Fund, Estimated
86 (3) Alabama Law Institute Fund, 100,000
87 Estimated
Page 4

100,000
Estimated
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
88 Total Legislative Services Agency 4,995,744 280,000 5,275,744
89 4. Legislature:
90 (a) Legislative Operations and 27,985,159 27,985,159
91 Support Program
92 (1) Permanent Joint 75,000
93 Transportation Committee
94 The Joint Transportation Committee shall file a semi-annual report with the
95 Chair of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Chair of
96 the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee regarding the
97 expenditure of these funds.
98 (2) Law Enforcement Medals 5,000
99 (3) Clerk of the House of 30,000
100 Representatives
101 For Service and Security Association Training Conference.
102 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
103 (1) State General Fund 27,985,159
104 Total Legislature 27,985,159 27,985,159
105 5. Office of the Speaker of the
106 House of Representatives:
107 (a) Office of the Speaker of the 1,581,031 1,581,031
108 House Program
109 In accordance with Section 29-4-60, Code of Alabama 1975.
110 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
111 (1) State General Fund 1,581,031
112 Total Office of the Speaker of the 1,581,031 1,581,031
113 House of Representatives
114 6. Office of the President Pro
115 Tempore of the Senate:
Page 5

Tempore of the Senate:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
116 (a) Legislative Operations and 2,117,941 2,117,941
117 Support Program
118 (1) Reapportionment Litigation 500,000
119 Expenses
120 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
121 (1) State General Fund 2,117,941
122 Total Office of the President Pro 2,117,941 2,117,941
123 Tempore of the Senate
124 B. Judicial Branch:
125 1. Court of Civil Appeals:
126 (a) Court Operations Program 5,457,579 5,457,579
127 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
128 (1) State General Fund 5,457,579
129 Total Court of Civil Appeals 5,457,579 5,457,579
130 2. Court of Criminal Appeals:
131 (a) Court Operations Program 5,468,189 5,468,189
132 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
133 (1) State General Fund 5,468,189
134 Total Court of Criminal Appeals 5,468,189 5,468,189
135 3. Judicial Inquiry Commission:
136 (a) Administrative Services 998,411 998,411
137 Program
138 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
139 (1) State General Fund 998,411
140 Total Judicial Inquiry Commission 998,411 998,411
141 4. Judicial Retirement Fund:
142 (a) Fringe Benefits Program 3,569,743 3,569,743
143 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 6

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
144 (1) State General Fund, 3,569,743
145 Estimated
146 Total Judicial Retirement Fund 3,569,743 3,569,743
147 5. Supreme Court:
148 (a) Court Operations Program 15,849,845 15,849,845
149 (1) Statewide Coordination of 125,697
150 Pro Bono Services in Civil
151 Cases
152 As required by Section 12-10A-4(b), Code of Alabama 1975. The Supreme Court
153 shall report semi-annually to the Chair of the House Ways and Means-General
154 Fund Committee, the Chair of the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund
155 Committee, Director of Finance, and the Director of the Legislative Services
156 Agency on the status of the updates to the case management and e-filing
157 systems.
158 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
159 (1) State General Fund 15,849,845
160 Total Supreme Court 15,849,845 15,849,845
161 6. Supreme Court Library:
162 (a) Court Operations Program 1,347,879 1,347,879
163 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
164 (1) State General Fund 1,347,879
165 Total Supreme Court Library 1,347,879 1,347,879
166 7. Unified Judicial System:
167 (a) Court Operations Program 170,198,560 56,033,204 226,231,764
168 (1) Access to Justice Project 94,317
169 (2) Juror Pay Increase 3,795,000
170 (3) 26th Judicial Circuit 60,000
171 (b) Administrative Services 3,871,330 3,871,330
172 Program
Page 7

3,871,330 3,871,330
Program
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
173 (c) Drug Court Program 2,090,612 2,090,612
174 (d) Juvenile Probation Officer 13,161,259 13,161,259
175 Services Program
176 (e) Alabama Sentencing 485,593 485,593
177 Commission
178 The Unified Judicial System shall file a report with the Chairs of the House
179 Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and
180 Taxation-General Fund Committee prior to October 1, 2026 regarding the number
181 of court referral officers in each district.
182 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
183 (1) State General Fund 189,807,354
184 (2) Federal and Local Funds, 18,847,092
185 Estimated
186 (3) Advanced Technology and Data 3,155,621
187 Exchange Fund
188 (4) Court Automation Fund 4,929,063
189 In accordance with Section 12-19-180, Code of Alabama 1975.
190 (5) Court Referral Officer Fund 5,479,600
191 In accordance with Sections 12-23-1 through 12-23-19, Code of Alabama 1975.
192 (6) Judicial Administration Fund 23,621,828
Page 8

(6) Judicial Administration Fund 23,621,828
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
193 In accordance with Sections 12-19-310 through 12-19-315, Code of Alabama 1975.
194 During fiscal year 2027, and notwithstanding any provision of law to the
195 contrary, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Alabama may transfer up to
196 $12,000,000 from local discretionary funds managed by circuit clerks and
197 circuit and district judges, including Circuit Clerk’s Funds, Circuit Clerk’s
198 Judicial Administration Funds, and Presiding Judge Judicial Administration
199 Funds. The Chief Justice may require each circuit clerk or judge responsible
200 for the administration of such funds to remit to the Administrative Office of
201 Courts a graduated proportional share of the available balances of such funds.
202 The Chief Justice may establish the schedule, methodology, and date used to
203 determine the balances subject to transfer, and any amounts expended after
204 that date that would otherwise reduce the balances subject to transfer may be
205 included in calculating the required remittance. Any funds transferred
206 pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Administrative Director of
207 Courts for deposit into the State Judicial Administration Fund and used for
208 the operational expenses of the Unified Judicial System in fiscal year 2027.
209 Total Unified Judicial System 189,807,354 56,033,204 245,840,558
210 C. Executive Branch:
211 1. Accountancy, Alabama State
212 Board of Public:
213 (a) Professional and 2,300,000 2,300,000
214 Occupational Licensing and
215 Regulation Program
216 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
217 (1) Alabama State Board of 2,300,000
218 Public Accountancy Fund
219 As provided in Section 34-1-22, Code of Alabama 1975. In addition to the
220 amount appropriated hereinabove to the State Board of Public Accountancy,
221 there is hereby appropriated such an amount as may be necessary to pay the
222 refund of any application for licenses which may have been rejected by the
223 Board or withdrawn at the request of the applicant.
Page 9

Board or withdrawn at the request of the applicant.
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
224 Total Accountancy, Alabama State 2,300,000 2,300,000
225 Board of Public
226 2. Adjustment, Board of:
227 (a) Special Services Program 1,518,639 1,518,639
228 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
229 (1) State General Fund - 16,500
230 Administrative Costs
231 As provided in Sections 41-9-61 and 41-9-67, Code of Alabama 1975.
232 (2) State General Fund, 1,502,139
233 Estimated
234 For expenditures as provided in Sections 31-3-2, 36-30-2 and 41-9-73, Code of
235 Alabama 1975.
236 Total Adjustment, Board of 1,518,639 1,518,639
237 3. Agricultural and Conservation
238 Development Commission:
239 (a) Water Resource Development 1,972,321 1,972,321
240 Program
241 (1) Statewide Feral Swine 337,500
242 Program
243 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
244 (1) State General Fund - 1,972,321
245 Transfer
246 Total Agricultural and 1,972,321 1,972,321
247 Conservation Development
248 Commission
249 4. Agriculture and Industries,
250 Department of:
251 (a) Administrative Services 14,435,221 9,527,068 23,962,289
252 Program
Page 10

14,435,221 9,527,068 23,962,289
Program
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
253 (1) Agricultural Economic 10,000
254 Development Impact Study
255 Maintenance
256 (2) Agricultural Museum Board 250,000
257 (3) Applied Research for 500,000
258 Emerging Cellulose Based
259 Products
260 (4) Geneva County Ag-Plex 100,000
261 Arena
262 (5) North Alabama Agriplex 350,000
263 (6) Poplar Head Farmers Market 100,000
264 (7) Resource Conservation and 9,456,242
265 Development Program
266 (8) State Fair Association 200,000
267 (b) Agricultural Inspection 4,287,678 23,385,645 27,673,323
268 Services Program
269 (1) Industrial Hemp Program 50,000
270 (c) Laboratory Analysis and 2,675,219 15,494,181 18,169,400
271 Disease Control Program
272 (d) Agricultural Development 1,003,874 16,370,000 17,373,874
273 Services Program
274 (1) Sweet Grown Alabama 300,000
275 Program
276 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
277 (1) State General Fund 22,401,992
278 (2) Agricultural Fund 54,781,224
279 (3) Egg Inspection Fund 25,000
280 (4) Shipping Point Inspection 8,470,670
281 Fund
Page 11

8,470,670
Fund
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
282 Pursuant to Sections 2-9-20, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
283 (5) Farmers' Market Authority 1,500,000
284 Fund
285 Total Agriculture and Industries, 22,401,992 64,776,894 87,178,886
286 Department of
287 5. Alabama Office of Civic
288 Engagement:
289 (a) Executive Direction Program 1,802,490 1,802,490
290 (1) Alabama HBCU Co-op 520,000
291 Program
292 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
293 (1) State General Fund 1,802,490
294 Total Alabama Office of Civic 1,802,490 1,802,490
295 Engagement
296 6. Alabama Trust Fund Board:
297 (a) Fiscal Management Program 21,365 21,365
298 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
299 (1) State General Fund 21,365
300 Total Alabama Trust Fund Board 21,365 21,365
301 7. Alcoholic Beverage Control
302 Board, Alabama :
303 (a) Alcoholic Beverage 127,961,935 127,961,935
304 Management Program
305 (b) Licensing, Regulation, 13,939,272 13,939,272
306 Enforcement Program
307 (c) Administrative Services 27,089,962 27,089,962
308 Program
309 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
310 (1) ABC Board Fund 166,991,169
Page 12

(1) ABC Board Fund 166,991,169
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
311 (2) Consumable Hemp Product 1,000,000
312 Compliance Fund
313 (3) Vaping and Licensing 1,000,000
314 Enforcement Fund
315 Total Alcoholic Beverage Control 168,991,169 168,991,169
316 Board, Alabama
317 In addition to the above appropriation herein made, there is hereby appropriated for
318 each additional retail and wholesale store that is relocated or put into operation
319 during the fiscal year, an amount equal to the sum required to install and operate a
320 comparable store in operation by said Board. There is further appropriated to the
321 Alabama Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, after provision has been made for the
322 other expenditures herein authorized, such sums as are or may be necessary to
323 purchase the alcoholic beverages which are essential to maintain adequate stocks and
324 inventory for an economic and successful sales operation. In addition to the above
325 appropriation, it is further provided that, in the event any county or municipality
326 of the state shall, during the fiscal period covered by this appropriation by proper
327 referendum, authorize the legal sale of malt and brewed beverages within such county
328 or municipality, there is further appropriated, in addition to the amount herein set
329 out, an amount comparable to that expended during the prior fiscal year for beer and
330 license tax supervision within counties or municipalities of similar size and
331 population. Provided further, that the amount appropriated herein shall be reduced
332 in like manner in the event any county or municipality wherein malt and brewed
333 beverages are now authorized by law to be sold shall, during the fiscal period
334 covered by this appropriation by proper referendum, declare unlawful the sale in
335 such county or municipality of such malt or brewed beverages. Notwithstanding any
336 other laws to the contrary, all revenue generated from bailment fees shall remain
337 with the Board to be used for its operations.
338 8. Architects, Board for
339 Registration of:
Page 13

Registration of:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
340 (a) Professional and 870,000 870,000
341 Occupational Licensing and
342 Regulation Program
343 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
344 (1) Fund for the Board for 870,000
345 Registration of Architects
346 As provided in Section 34-2-41, Code of Alabama 1975.
347 Total Architects, Board for 870,000 870,000
348 Registration of
349 9. Archives and History,
350 Department of:
351 (a) Historical Resources 3,214,804 1,082,996 4,297,800
352 Management Program
353 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
354 (1) State General Fund 3,214,804
355 (2) Archives Historical 427
356 Collections Fund
357 In accordance with Section 41-6-71, Code of Alabama 1975.
358 (3) Archives Memorial Fund 19,050
359 (4) Archives Services Fund 850,000
360 In accordance with Section 41-6-76, Code of Alabama 1975.
361 (5) Federal Grants Fund 100,000
362 (6) Stonewall Jackson Memorial 113,519
363 Fund
364 Total Archives and History, 3,214,804 1,082,996 4,297,800
365 Department of
366 10. Assisted Living
367 Administrators, Alabama Board
368 of Examiners of:
Page 14

of Examiners of:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
369 (a) Professional and 180,650 180,650
370 Occupational Licensing and
371 Regulation Program
372 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
373 (1) Alabama State Board of 180,650
374 Examiners of Assisted Living
375 Administrators Fund
376 As provided in Sections 34-2A-1 through 34-2A-16, Code of Alabama 1975.
377 Total Assisted Living 180,650 180,650
378 Administrators, Alabama Board of
379 Examiners of
380 11. Athlete Agents Commission,
381 Alabama:
382 (a) Professional and 20,000 20,000
383 Occupational Licensing and
384 Regulation Program
385 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
386 (1) Athlete Agents Regulatory 20,000
387 Commission Fund
388 As provided in Section 8-26B-31, Code of Alabama 1975.
389 Total Athlete Agents Commission, 20,000 20,000
390 Alabama
391 12. Athletic Commission, Alabama:
392 (a) Licensing, Regulation and 275,000 275,000
393 Enforcement Program
394 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
395 (1) Alabama Boxing Commission 275,000
396 Fund
397 Total Athletic Commission, Alabama 275,000 275,000
Page 15

Total Athletic Commission, Alabama 275,000 275,000
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
398 13. Athletic Trainers, Alabama
399 Board of:
400 (a) Professional and 150,000 150,000
401 Occupational Licensing and
402 Regulation Program
403 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
404 (1) Alabama Athletic Trainers 150,000
405 Fund
406 As provided in Section 34-40-14, Code of Alabama 1975.
407 Total Athletic Trainers, Alabama 150,000 150,000
408 Board of
409 14. Attorney General, Office of
410 the :
411 (a) Legal Advice and Legal 12,730,902 20,690,231 33,421,133
412 Services Program
413 (1) Huntsville Area Crime 25,000
414 Stoppers
415 (2) Central Alabama Crime 275,000
416 Stoppers
417 (b) Fair Marketing Practices 1,076,226 1,576,416 2,652,642
418 Program
419 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
420 (1) State General Fund 13,807,128
421 (2) Attorney General Litigation 18,048,081
422 Support Fund
423 In accordance with Section 36-15-4.2, Code of Alabama 1975.
424 (3) Federal Funds 1,250,000
425 (4) Miscellaneous Receipts 2,968,566
426 Total Attorney General, Office of 13,807,128 22,266,647 36,073,775
427 the
Page 16

13,807,128 22,266,647 36,073,775
the
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
428 The Attorney General shall have the authority to expend any funds transferred from
429 the State Personnel Department.
430 15. Auctioneers, Alabama State
431 Board of :
432 (a) Professional and 275,000 275,000
433 Occupational Licensing and
434 Regulation Program
435 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
436 (1) State Board of Auctioneers 275,000
437 Fund
438 Total Auctioneers, Alabama State 275,000 275,000
439 Board of
440 16. Auditor, State:
441 (a) Fiscal Management Program 1,304,008 1,304,008
442 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
443 (1) State General Fund 1,304,008
444 Total Auditor, State 1,304,008 1,304,008
445 17. Bail Bonding Board, Alabama
446 Professional:
447 (a) Professional and 250,000 250,000
448 Occupational Licensing and
449 Regulation Program
450 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
451 (1) Alabama Bail Bond Board Fund 250,000
452 Total Bail Bonding Board, Alabama 250,000 250,000
453 Professional
454 18. Banking Department, State:
455 (a) Charter, License and 22,495,000 22,495,000
456 Regulate Financial
457 Institutions Program
Page 17

22,495,000 22,495,000
Institutions Program
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
458 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
459 (1) Banking Assessment Fees 16,998,000
460 As provided in Section 5-2A-20, Code of Alabama 1975.
461 (2) Loan Examination Fund 5,497,000
462 As provided in Sections 5-2A-24 and 5-18-5, Code of Alabama 1975.
463 Total Banking Department, State 22,495,000 22,495,000
464 19. Bar Association, Alabama
465 State:
466 (a) Professional and 7,190,000 7,190,000
467 Occupational Licensing and
468 Regulation Program
469 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
470 (1) Federal and Local Funds 1,179,925
471 As provided in Sections 34-3-17 and 34-3-18, Code of Alabama 1975.
472 (2) State Bar Association Fund 6,010,075
473 As provided in Sections 34-3-4 and 34-3-44, Code of Alabama 1975.
474 Total Bar Association, Alabama 7,190,000 7,190,000
475 State
476 20. Building Renovation Finance
477 Authority, Alabama:
478 (a) Administrative Support 1,488,229 1,488,229
479 Services Program
480 (1) Alabama State House 1,488,229
481 Operations and Maintenance
482 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
483 (1) State General Fund - 1,488,229
484 Transfer
485 Total Building Renovation Finance 1,488,229 1,488,229
486 Authority, Alabama
Page 18

1,488,229 1,488,229
Authority, Alabama
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
487 Of the above appropriation, $1,488,229 shall be expended for operations and
488 maintenance of the Alabama State House, in accordance with Section 29-2-202, Code of
489 Alabama 1975.
490 21. Child Abuse and Neglect
491 Prevention, State Department
492 of:
493 (a) Social Services Program 566,931 16,808,592 17,375,523
494 (1) Human Trafficking Task 60,000
495 Force established by Act
496 2014-199
497 In accordance with Sections 26-16-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
498 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
499 (1) State General Fund - 566,931
500 Transfer
501 (2) Child Abuse Prevention 16,808,592
502 Operating Fund
503 Total Child Abuse and Neglect 566,931 16,808,592 17,375,523
504 Prevention, State Department of
505 22. Children's Services
506 Facilitation Team:
507 (a) Human Services Program 547,800 547,800
508 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
509 (1) Departmental Receipts 547,800
510 As provided in Section 12-15-508, Code of Alabama 1975.
511 Total Children's Services 547,800 547,800
512 Facilitation Team
513 23. Chiropractic Examiners,
514 Alabama State Board of:
Page 19

Alabama State Board of:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
515 (a) Professional and 651,000 651,000
516 Occupational Licensing and
517 Regulation Program
518 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
519 (1) Alabama State Board of 651,000
520 Chiropractic Examiner's Fund
521 As provided in Section 34-24-143, Code of Alabama 1975.
522 Total Chiropractic Examiners, 651,000 651,000
523 Alabama State Board of
524 24. Choctawhatchee, Pea and Yellow
525 Rivers Watershed Management
526 Authority:
527 (a) Water Resource Development 50,000 50,000
528 Program
529 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
530 (1) Choctawhatchee, Pea and 50,000
531 Yellow Rivers Fund
532 Total Choctawhatchee, Pea and 50,000 50,000
533 Yellow Rivers Watershed Management
534 Authority
535 25. Commerce, Department of:
536 (a) Industrial Development 17,994,652 4,010,000 22,004,652
537 Program
538 (1) Alabama Port Authority 4,000,000
539 For capital projects.
540 (2) Innovation Depot 3,000,000
541 (3) Alabama Growth Alliance 1,500,000
542 For the development of growth strategies for rural and energy infrastructure
543 development as part of the Catalyst strategic plan.
Page 20

development as part of the Catalyst strategic plan.
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
544 (4) Decatur Morgan County Port 500,000
545 Authority
546 For dock improvements.
547 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
548 (1) State General Fund 17,994,652
549 (2) Alabama Developmental Fund 4,000,000
550 (3) Departmental Receipts 10,000
551 Total Commerce, Department of 17,994,652 4,010,000 22,004,652
552 26. Conservation and Natural
553 Resources, Department of:
554 (a) State Land Management 105,920,244 105,920,244
555 Program
556 (b) Outdoor Recreation Sites and 1,500,000 74,263,953 75,763,953
557 Services Program
558 (1) Ultimate Angler World 1,000,000
559 Championship Event
560 (2) Wheeler Wildlife Refuge 500,000
561 (c) Game and Fish Program 1,500,000 65,072,859 66,572,859
562 (1) Raptor Project 1,500,000
563 (d) Marine Resources Program 17,342,559 17,342,559
564 (e) Administrative Services 13,271,089 13,271,089
565 Program
566 (f) Capital Outlay Program 250,000 27,807,069 28,057,069
567 (1) Parks and outdoor 250,000
568 recreational facilities and
569 improvements
570 a. Cheaha State Park - Fire 250,000
571 Building
Page 21

250,000
Building
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
572 (g) Deepwater Horizon Oil Spill 165,929,001 165,929,001
573 Restoration
574 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
575 (1) State General Fund 3,250,000
576 (2) Forever Wild Trust Fund - 900,000
577 Transfer
578 The funds hereinabove appropriated shall be payable as provided in Sections
579 9-2-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
580 (3) GOMESA, Estimated 91,352,569
581 (4) State Lands Fund 19,017,675
582 (5) State Lands Fund - Coastal 1,000,000
583 Pursuant to Section 40-23-77, Code of Alabama 1975.
584 (6) Parks Revolving Fund, 66,627,992
585 Estimated
586 (7) State Parks Fund 6,382,961
587 (8) State Parks Fund - Cigarette 3,000,000
588 Tax
589 (9) State Parks Fund, Estimated 8,733,000
590 Pursuant to Section 40-23-35, Code of Alabama 1975.
591 (10) Game and Fish Fund - 63,634,646
592 Licenses, Fines, Fees,
593 Interest Income and Other
594 Departmental Receipts
595 (11) Game and Fish Fund - Use 1,900,000
596 Tax
597 (12) State Reservoir Management 4,015,282
598 Grant Fund
599 Pursuant to Section 9-2-170, Code of Alabama 1975.
600 (13) BP Oil Funds 29,589,705
Page 22

(13) BP Oil Funds 29,589,705
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
601 (14) Marine Resources Fund - 16,140,000
602 Licenses, Taxes, Fines and
603 Other Departmental Receipts
604 (15) Marine Resources Fund - Use 380,000
605 Tax
606 Pursuant to Section 40-23-77, Code of Alabama 1975.
607 (16) Administrative Fund 13,271,089
608 (17) State Parks Fund - DOT 500,000
609 Transfer
610 (18) RESTORE Act 143,161,855
611 Total Conservation and Natural 3,250,000 469,606,774 472,856,774
612 Resources, Department of
613 The appropriation to the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources shall
614 include Alabama's pro rata share of the Gulf States Marine Fisheries Commission's
615 operating expenses. The appropriation to the Department of Conservation and Natural
616 Resources includes funds for the maintenance, staff, and repair of the Governor's
617 official beach mansion.
618 27. Construction Recruitment
619 Institute, Alabama:
620 (a) Recruitment, Training and 2,100,000 2,100,000
621 Promotion Program
622 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
623 (1) Recruitment and Training 2,100,000
624 Promotion Fund
625 Pursuant to Sections 41-10-720 through 41-10-726, Code of Alabama 1975.
626 Total Construction Recruitment 2,100,000 2,100,000
627 Institute, Alabama
628 28. Contractors, State Licensing
629 Board for General:
Page 23

Board for General:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
630 (a) Professional and 2,891,000 2,891,000
631 Occupational Licensing and
632 Regulation Program
633 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
634 (1) State Licensing Board for 2,891,000
635 General Contractors Fund
636 Pursuant to Section 34-8-25, Code of Alabama 1975. In addition to the amount
637 appropriated hereinabove to the State Licensing Board for General Contractors,
638 there is hereby appropriated such an amount as may be necessary to pay the
639 refund of any application for licenses which may have been rejected by the
640 Board or application withdrawn at the request of the applicant.
641 Total Contractors, State Licensing 2,891,000 2,891,000
642 Board for General
643 29. Corrections, Department of:
644 (a) Administrative Services and 45,436,713 45,436,713
645 Logistical Support Program
646 (b) Institutional Services 822,582,680 73,119,692 895,702,372
647 Corrections Program
648 The Department of Corrections shall file a report with the Chairs of the House
649 Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and
650 Taxation-General Fund Committee and the Legislative Fiscal Officer prior to
651 the first day of the 2027 Regular Session regarding expenditures for mental
652 health and healthcare services for inmates in fiscal year 2026, including a
653 detailed explanation of cost increases.
654 (1) Community Corrections 14,350,000
655 Program
656 a. Ex-offender Small Business 200,000
657 Support Program
Page 24

200,000
Support Program
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
658 b. Lawrence County Community 250,000
659 Corrections and Court
660 Services Commission
661 (2) Therapeutic Education in 6,900,000
662 Columbiana, Alabama
663 (3) LEOTech 1,500,000
664 (c) Correctional Industries 40,271,660 40,271,660
665 Program
666 The Department of Corrections shall not utilize any portion of its State
667 General Fund appropriation to support the Correctional Agricultural and
668 Industries Program.
669 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
670 (1) State General Fund 868,019,393
671 (2) DOC Miscellaneous and 64,619,692
672 Federal Funds, Estimated
673 (3) Drug Demand Reduction Fund 8,500,000
674 In accordance with Section 13A-12-283, Code of Alabama 1975.
675 (4) Correctional Agricultural 5,187,000
676 Fund, Estimated
677 (5) Corrections Industries - 35,084,660
678 Other Funds
679 The Commissioner of the Department of Corrections is authorized to utilize
680 funds herein appropriated as matching contributions, where required and
681 appropriate, to generate additional funds which would effectively increase the
682 appropriations for the Department of Corrections. Any such grant funds so
683 generated and in direct support for the Department of Corrections' operations
684 are also hereby appropriated.
685 Total Corrections, Department of 868,019,393 113,391,352 981,410,745
Page 25

Total Corrections, Department of 868,019,393 113,391,352 981,410,745
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
686 Of the above General Fund appropriation to the Department of Corrections,
687 $40,000,000 shall be conditional and shall not be released until the Department
688 certifies to the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the
689 Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee, the Director of Finance, and the
690 Legislative Fiscal Officer that the following has occurred: (1) the new prison
691 facility in Elmore County is at least ninety percent (90%) completed; and (2) when
692 started, the progress of the utility infrastructure and construction for the new
693 prison facility in Escambia County is reported quarterly to the Chairs of the House
694 Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and Taxation-General
695 Fund Committee, the Director of Finance, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer. This
696 quarterly reporting shall begin on October 1, 2026.
697 In fiscal year 2027, the Department of Corrections shall report monthly to the Joint
698 Legislative Prison Oversight Committee, the Chairs of the House Ways and
699 Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund
700 Committee, the Director of Finance, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer on the number
701 of officers at the end of the month, the net increase from September 30, 2018, and
702 the monthly retention rate. The report shall also provide an analysis of the issues
703 contributing to the Department’s progress in hiring, retaining, and training new
704 correctional officers. In addition to all other appropriations to the Department of
705 Corrections, there is hereby conditionally appropriated to the Department of
706 Corrections any receipts from the sale of Corrections' assets which are deposited
707 into the State General Fund. This appropriation is conditioned upon proceeds from
708 the sale of any Corrections' assets being deposited into the State General Fund, the
709 recommendation of the Director of Finance, and the approval of the Governor.
710 30. Cosmetology and Barbering,
711 Alabama Board of:
712 (a) Professional and 3,925,000 3,925,000
713 Occupational Licensing and
714 Regulation Program
715 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
716 (1) Alabama Board of Cosmetology 3,925,000
717 and Barbering Fund
Page 26

3,925,000
and Barbering Fund
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
718 As provided in Section 34-7B-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
719 Total Cosmetology and Barbering, 3,925,000 3,925,000
720 Alabama Board of
721 31. Counseling, Alabama Board of
722 Examiners in:
723 (a) Professional and 975,000 975,000
724 Occupational Licensing and
725 Regulation Program
726 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
727 (1) Alabama Board of Examiners 975,000
728 in Counseling Fund
729 As provided in Section 34-8A-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
730 Total Counseling, Alabama Board of 975,000 975,000
731 Examiners in
732 32. Court Reporting, Alabama Board
733 of :
734 (a) Professional and 200,000 200,000
735 Occupational Licensing and
736 Regulation Program
737 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
738 (1) Alabama Board of Court 200,000
739 Reporting Fund
740 As provided in Section 34-8B-17, Code of Alabama 1975.
741 Total Court Reporting, Alabama 200,000 200,000
742 Board of
743 33. Credit Union Administration,
744 Alabama:
745 (a) Charter, License and 2,808,002 2,808,002
746 Regulate Financial
747 Institutions Program
Page 27

2,808,002 2,808,002
Institutions Program
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
748 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
749 (1) Alabama Credit Union 2,808,002
750 Administration Fund
751 As provided in Section 5-17-7, Code of Alabama 1975.
752 Total Credit Union Administration, 2,808,002 2,808,002
753 Alabama
754 34. Crime Victims Compensation
755 Commission, Alabama:
756 (a) Special Services Program, 1,900,000 3,055,000 4,955,000
757 Estimated
758 (1) To be expended for the 200,000
759 expenses associated with
760 processing SAFE
761 (2) To be expended in 1,400,000
762 accordance with Sections
763 15-23-1 through 15-23-23,
764 Code of Alabama 1975
765 (3) Victims of Crime and 300,000
766 Leniency (VOCAL)
767 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
768 (1) State General Fund - 1,900,000
769 Transfer
770 (2) Alabama Crime Victims 3,055,000
771 Compensation Commission
772 Fund, Estimated
773 To be expended in accordance with Sections 15-23-1 through 15-23-23, Code of
774 Alabama 1975.
775 Total Crime Victims Compensation 1,900,000 3,055,000 4,955,000
776 Commission, Alabama
777 35. Debt Service:
Page 28

35. Debt Service:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
778 (a) General Obligation Bonds, 17,623,398 18,848,524 36,471,922
779 Estimated
780 (b) Alabama Corrections 45,592,143 45,592,143
781 Institution Finance Authority
782 The above appropriation to the Alabama Corrections Institution Finance
783 Authority (ACIFA) is conditioned upon ACIFA being required to make a debt
784 service payment during fiscal year 2027 on bonds issued pursuant to the
785 authorization granted by Section 14-2-12, Code of Alabama 1975. Any of the
786 above appropriation that is not needed to make a debt service payment during
787 fiscal year 2027 on bonds issued pursuant to the authorization granted by
788 Section 14-2-12, Code of Alabama 1975, is appropriated to the Department of
789 Corrections-Correctional Capital Improvement Fund.
790 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
791 (1) State General Fund, 17,623,398
792 Transfer, Estimated
793 (2) State General Fund - 45,592,143
794 Transfer
795 (3) Alabama Capital Improvement 18,848,524
796 Trust Fund Transfer,
797 Estimated
798 Total Debt Service 63,215,541 18,848,524 82,064,065
799 The above appropriation shall be used to pay debt service on the following General
800 Obligation Bonds: Series 2014-A, Series 2016-A, Series 2016-C, Series 2018-A, Series
801 2018-B, Series 2022-A, and Series 2026-A. The above appropriation shall be used to
802 pay debt service on the Alabama Corrections Institution Finance Authority (ACIFA)
803 bonds: ACIFA 2022-A, and ACIFA 2026-A. In the event any of the above bonds are
804 refunded or new General Obligation bonds are issued, debt service on these newly
805 issued bonds may be paid from the appropriations made above from either the State
806 General Fund or the Capital Improvement Trust Fund contingent upon the
807 recommendation of the Director of Finance and the approval of the Governor.
Page 29

recommendation of the Director of Finance and the approval of the Governor.
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
808 36. Dietetics/Nutrition Practice,
809 Alabama State Board of
810 Examiners for:
811 (a) Professional and 575,000 575,000
812 Occupational Licensing and
813 Regulation Program
814 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
815 (1) State Board of 575,000
816 Dietetics/Nutrition Fund
817 As provided in Section 34-34A-8, Code of Alabama 1975.
818 Total Dietetics/Nutrition 575,000 575,000
819 Practice, Alabama State Board of
820 Examiners for
821 37. District Attorneys:
822 (a) Court Operations Program 53,301,886 53,301,886
823 (1) District Attorneys 35,866,838
824 Administrative Fund for use
825 in the District Attorney's
826 Office of the several
827 Judicial Circuits
828 The above funds shall be allocated to the several judicial circuits based
829 upon a formula established by the Alabama District Attorneys Association.
830 Before February 1, 2027, the District Attorneys shall file a consolidated
831 report with the Chair of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee,
832 the Chair of the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee,
833 Director of Finance, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer regarding the amount
834 of funds collected and the expenditure of any funds received from pretrial
835 diversion or other revenue-raising measures in each judicial circuit in
836 fiscal year 2026.
Page 30

fiscal year 2026.
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
837 (2) Salaries and Expenses of 8,192,577
838 Supernumerary District
839 Attorneys
840 (3) Salaries of District 9,223,471
841 Attorneys
842 (4) Travel Expenses of 19,000
843 District Attorneys
844 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
845 (1) State General Fund 17,435,048
846 (2) State General Fund - 35,866,838
847 Transfer
848 Total District Attorneys 53,301,886 53,301,886
849 38. Drycleaning Environmental
850 Response Trust Fund Advisory
851 Board, Alabama:
852 (a) Self Insurance Program 500,000 500,000
853 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
854 (1) Alabama Drycleaning 500,000
855 Environmental Response Trust
856 Fund
857 Total Drycleaning Environmental 500,000 500,000
858 Response Trust Fund Advisory
859 Board, Alabama
860 As provided in Sections 22-30D-1 through 22-30D-12, Code of Alabama 1975.
861 39. Economic and Community
862 Affairs, Alabama Department
863 of:
864 (a) Administrative Support 2,577,345 15,600,258 18,177,603
865 Services Program
866 (b) Planning Program 37,566,782 320,131,353 357,698,135
Page 31

(b) Planning Program 37,566,782 320,131,353 357,698,135
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
867 It is the intent of the Legislature to provide from the Planning Program
868 assistance to low-income and elderly citizens who live on fixed incomes for
869 large increases in energy bills due to increases allowed by the Public Service
870 Commission.
871 (1) Airport Development Grant 15,000,000
872 Program
873 To be operated through an intergovernmental agreement with the Department of
874 Transportation, provided however, prior to awarding any other grants, the
875 Department of Transportation shall establish and publish guidelines
876 regarding the criteria required for an airport to receive a grant and shall
877 provide this information to all members of the Legislature. The Department
878 shall ensure that the total amount of grants awarded to Birmingham,
879 Huntsville, and Mobile airports do not exceed 50% of the funds appropriated
880 for the program and that any grants awarded for projects qualified or
881 approved for a federal grant among those airports are for equal amounts.
882 (2) Alabama Association of 7,250,526
883 Regional Councils
884 (3) Alabama Coalition Against 475,000
885 Domestic Violence
886 (4) Alabama Women's Commission 65,561
887 (5) Anniston Army Depot 75,000
888 (6) Birmingham Police 50,000
889 Athletics Youth Program
890 (7) BRAC Ft. Rucker 75,000
891 (8) BRAC Montgomery 75,000
892 (9) City of Arab 120,000
893 (10) City of Bessemer - 20,000
894 Bessemer Recreation Center
Page 32

20,000
Bessemer Recreation Center
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
895 (11) City of Birmingham for 250,000
896 City Walk maintenance
897 (12) City of Fairfield - Willie 250,000
898 Mays Park
899 (13) City of Greenville 50,000
900 (14) City of Hoover 200,000
901 (15) City of Madison for public 100,000
902 safety communications
903 (16) City of Owens Cross Roads 100,000
904 (17) City of Oxford for 250,000
905 regional public safety
906 (18) City of Trussville park 300,000
907 upgrades
908 (19) City of Vernon park 100,000
909 improvements
910 (20) Community Action Agencies 750,000
911 To be distributed as a grant to the Community Action Association of Alabama,
912 which shall distribute the funds to the twenty-two recognized Community
913 Action administering Agencies provided for in Sections 11-96-1 through
914 11-96-6, Code of Alabama 1975, based on their populations below the poverty
915 level. The Community Action Association of Alabama shall not expend more
916 than ten percent of the funds for administrative expenses.
917 (21) Decatur Youth Symphony 500,000
918 (22) East Metro Crime Center 150,000
919 (23) Food Bank Grant Program 1,000,000
920 To be disbursed based on the goal factor calculation for each food bank.
921 (24) Fort Benning Russell 75,000
922 County BRAC
923 (25) Frisco City park 200,000
Page 33

(25) Frisco City park 200,000
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
924 (26) Healthy Food Financing 200,000
925 Initiative
926 (27) Henry County Sheriff's 250,000
927 Training Facility
928 (28) Main Street Alabama 1,500,000
929 Program
930 To be equally distributed to the members of the Main Street Alabama Program
931 as of October 1, 2026.
932 (29) Memorial Park renovations 50,000
933 (30) Military Stabilization 460,000
934 Committee
935 (31) Municipal Public Emergency 2,500,000
936 Response Grant Program
937 For a grant program for municipalities with populations of 2,500 or fewer
938 residents as of the last U.S. Decennial Census that are a minimum
939 of 25 miles from a hospital to aid in capital startup costs related to
940 establishing a public emergency response program or ambulance
941 service. Priority shall be given to municipalities that contribute matching
942 funds or have already acquired real property for this purpose. Grant
943 recipients shall comply with Alabama Administrative Code Rules 420-2-1.15,
944 420-2-1.16, 420-2-1.19, and 420-2-1.20 related to Emergency Medical Services
945 within 6 months of receipt of the grant. Any municipality receiving a grant
946 that fails to meet the above requirements within 6 months shall repay the
947 grant funds to the Department.
948 (32) North Alabama Public 600,000
949 Energy District
950 (33) PALS/Adopt-a-Mile Program 200,000
951 (34) Redemption Earned 100,000
952 (35) Selma Memorial Stadium 50,000
Page 34

(35) Selma Memorial Stadium 50,000
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
953 (36) Southern Rails Commission 60,000
954 (37) Space Command 150,000
955 (38) The Good Sport 200,000
956 (39) Town of Ardmore for parks 50,000
957 and recreation
958 (40) Town of Brighton 50,000
959 (41) Town of Chatom 100,000
960 (42) Town of Killen 25,000
961 (43) Town of Midfield 50,000
962 (44) Town of New Brockton 275,000
963 (45) Town of Notasulga 100,000
964 (46) Town of St. Florian fire 50,000
965 department upgrade
966 (47) Town of Waterloo 20,000
967 (48) Tuskegee Cultural Center 50,000
968 (49) Walker County Community 25,000
969 Action Agency
970 (50) Walker County Courthouse 150,000
971 (51) West Escambia Utilities 200,000
972 (52) Winston County fire 400,000
973 station construction
974 (one-time)
975 (53) Woodlawn Foundation 150,000
976 (c) Energy Management Program 6,063,195 84,599,530 90,662,725
977 (d) Law Enforcement Planning and 1,003,759 116,616,035 117,619,794
978 Development Program
979 (e) Surplus Property Program 540,953 3,533,813 4,074,766
980 (f) Water Resources Program 3,128,598 7,794,080 10,922,678
Page 35

(f) Water Resources Program 3,128,598 7,794,080 10,922,678
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
981 (1) Coalition of Alabama 325,000
982 Waterways Association
983 To be expended equally for the Coosa-Alabama River Improvement Association,
984 the Tri-Rivers Water Development Association, the Tennessee River Valley
985 Association, the Warrior-Tombigbee Waterway Association, and the
986 Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway Council.
987 (2) State Property Floodplain 1,200,000
988 Management Program
989 (3) Legal Fees for the 538,650
990 Tri-State Water Litigation
991 Up to the amount above (maximum).
992 (g) Broadband Program 750,000 1,002,000,000 1,002,750,000
993 The above appropriation shall be expended for the Broadband Accessibility
994 Grant Program.
995 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
996 (1) State General Fund 51,630,632
997 (2) Administrative Transfers and 15,600,258
998 Other Departmental Receipts
999 (3) Federal and Local Funds 1,512,615,998
1000 (4) Neighbors Helping Neighbors 25,000
1001 Fund
1002 (5) Domestic Violence Trust Fund 3,000,000
1003 (6) Juvenile Accountability 9,000,000
1004 Incentive Block Fund
1005 (7) State Safety Coordinating 3,000,000
1006 Fund
1007 (8) Traffic Safety Trust Fund 3,500,000
1008 (9) Administrative Transfers 2,163,473
1009 from Federal-Donated Surplus
1010 Property Sales, Estimated
Page 36

2,163,473
Property Sales, Estimated
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1011 (10) Administrative Transfers 1,370,340
1012 from State-Owned Surplus
1013 Property Sales, Estimated
1014 Total Economic and Community 51,630,632 1,550,275,069 1,601,905,701
1015 Affairs, Alabama Department of
1016 It is the intent of the Legislature that all grants shall follow the standard and
1017 proper grant process and shall meet all departmental guidelines. The Director of the
1018 Alabama Department of Economic and Community Affairs shall report to the Chairs of
1019 the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and
1020 Taxation-General Fund Committee and the Legislative Fiscal Officer all funds and
1021 grants expended specifically in areas with high unemployment and low personal income
1022 levels. The report shall detail the amount of funds available in each program and
1023 the amount of funds expended in these targeted areas. The Director of the Alabama
1024 Department of Economic and Community Affairs shall report within thirty days after
1025 the end of each quarter all grants made by the Department in the previous quarter to
1026 the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance
1027 and Taxation-General Fund Committee, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer. The report
1028 shall include the recipient of the grant, the source of funds for each grant, and
1029 the purpose of each grant. The Director of the Alabama Department of Economic and
1030 Community Affairs shall notify all members of the local legislative delegation five
1031 days prior to the announcement of any grant made to any entity located in the
1032 legislative jurisdiction. The five days prior notice requirement shall be waived in
1033 the event of a declared emergency. The Governor shall encourage the Department to
1034 disburse the funds provided herein on a nondiscriminatory basis.
1035 40. Electrical Contractors, Board
1036 of:
1037 (a) Professional and 1,110,000 1,110,000
1038 Occupational Licensing and
1039 Regulation Program
1040 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 37

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1041 (1) Alabama Board of Electrical 1,110,000
1042 Contractors Fund
1043 As provided in Section 34-36-17, Code of Alabama 1975.
1044 Total Electrical Contractors, 1,110,000 1,110,000
1045 Board of
1046 41. Electronic Security Board of
1047 Licensure, Alabama:
1048 (a) Professional and 475,000 475,000
1049 Occupational Licensing and
1050 Regulation Program
1051 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1052 (1) Alabama Electronic Security 475,000
1053 Board of Licensure Fund
1054 Total Electronic Security Board of 475,000 475,000
1055 Licensure, Alabama
1056 42. Emergency Management Agency:
1057 (a) Readiness and Recovery 11,367,212 83,976,785 95,343,997
1058 Program
1059 (1) Alabama Disaster Relief 500,000
1060 Fund
1061 (2) Dam safety program 1,000,000
1062 (3) Gap-Filling Weather Data 300,000
1063 Fund
1064 (4) Statewide Emergency 250,000
1065 Notification
1066 (5) Wireless Commission 200,000
1067 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1068 (1) State General Fund 10,757,212
1069 (2) State General Fund Transfer 610,000
1070 - Local EMA Assistance Fund
Page 38

610,000
- Local EMA Assistance Fund
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1071 (3) Federal - Operating Funds 12,518,735
1072 (4) Federal - Prior Year 70,848,050
1073 Disaster Funds
1074 (5) Local EMA Assistance Fund 610,000
1075 From the above appropriation, the amounts necessary to comply with the
1076 provisions of Sections 31-9-60 through 31-9-62, Code of Alabama 1975, are
1077 hereby appropriated and shall be expended for the purposes provided for in
1078 Section 31-9-62, Code of Alabama 1975.
1079 Total Emergency Management Agency 11,367,212 83,976,785 95,343,997
1080 43. Employees' Suggestion
1081 Incentive Board, Alabama:
1082 (a) Employees' Suggestion 9,500 9,500
1083 Incentive Program
1084 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1085 (1) State General Fund 9,500
1086 Total Employees' Suggestion 9,500 9,500
1087 Incentive Board, Alabama
1088 The Employees' Suggestion Incentive Board shall collaborate with the Department of
1089 Finance to ensure that all state employees are informed of the financial incentive
1090 awards available to state employees whose adopted suggestions result in substantial
1091 financial savings or improvements in the efficiency of state operations pursuant to
1092 Section 36-1-7.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
1093 44. Engineers and Land Surveyors,
1094 State Board of Licensure for
1095 Professional:
1096 (a) Professional and 2,280,813 2,280,813
1097 Occupational Licensing and
1098 Regulation Program
1099 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 39

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1100 (1) Professional Engineers and 2,280,813
1101 Professional Land Surveyors
1102 Fund
1103 As provided in Section 34-11-36, Code of Alabama 1975.
1104 Total Engineers and Land 2,280,813 2,280,813
1105 Surveyors, State Board of
1106 Licensure for Professional
1107 45. Environmental Management,
1108 Department of:
1109 (a) Environmental Management 15,029,815 299,304,248 314,334,063
1110 Program
1111 (1) State Match Required for 5,000,000
1112 Federal Funding from
1113 Drinking Water State
1114 Revolving Funds and the
1115 Clean Water State Revolving
1116 Funds
1117 (2) Concentrated Animal 375,000
1118 Feeding Operation Program
1119 (CAFO)
1120 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1121 (1) State General Fund - 15,029,815
1122 Transfer
1123 (2) Alabama Recycling Fund 3,505,000
1124 In accordance with Sections 22-27-17 and 22-27-18, Code of Alabama 1975.
1125 (3) Departmental Receipts 831,962
1126 (4) Environmental Management 43,920,990
1127 Fines and Fees
1128 As provided in Section 22-22A-11, Code of Alabama 1975.
1129 (5) Federal Funds 23,673,800
Page 40

(5) Federal Funds 23,673,800
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1130 (6) Federal Match - Public Water 112,000,000
1131 Authority
1132 (7) Federal Match - Water 50,943,484
1133 Pollution Control Authority
1134 (8) Hazardous Substance Cleanup 493,966
1135 Fund
1136 As provided in Sections 22-30A-3 through 22-30A-11, Code of Alabama 1975.
1137 (9) Pollution Control Grant Fund 600,000
1138 As provided in Section 22-22A-16, Code of Alabama 1975.
1139 (10) Public Water SRF 3,851,845
1140 Administrative Fees
1141 (11) Scrap Tire Fund 6,600,000
1142 As provided in Section 22-40A-15, Code of Alabama 1975.
1143 (12) Scrap Tire Fund - Transfer 1,610,000
1144 As provided in Section 22-40A-22, Code of Alabama 1975.
1145 (13) Solid Waste Fund 5,750,000
1146 In accordance with Sections 22-27-17 and 22-27-18, Code of Alabama 1975.
1147 (14) SRF Administrative Fees 5,973,466
1148 As provided in Section 22-34-3, Code of Alabama 1975.
1149 (15) Underground and Aboveground 36,800,000
1150 Storage Tank Trust Fund
1151 As provided in Section 22-35-5, Code of Alabama 1975. The above appropriation
1152 shall be conditioned upon the expenditure of such funds solely for the
1153 purposes provided for in Chapter 35 of Title 22, Code of Alabama 1975.
1154 (16) Underground and Aboveground 2,749,735
1155 Storage Tank Trust Fund -
1156 Transfer
1157 As provided in Section 22-35-9, Code of Alabama 1975.
1158 Total Environmental Management, 15,029,815 299,304,248 314,334,063
1159 Department of
Page 41

15,029,815 299,304,248 314,334,063
Department of
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1160 46. Ethics Commission, Alabama:
1161 (a) Regulation of Public 2,547,241 2,547,241
1162 Officials and Employees
1163 Program
1164 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1165 (1) State General Fund, 2,547,241
1166 Estimated
1167 Total Ethics Commission, Alabama 2,547,241 2,547,241
1168 As provided in Section 36-25-29, Code of Alabama 1975. The minimum appropriation
1169 provision shall include the reversion reappropriated amount, if any.
1170 47. Finance, Department of:
1171 (a) Fiscal Management Program 3,066,362 20,715,687 23,782,049
1172 (b) Administrative Support 836,604 106,419,115 107,255,719
1173 Services Program
1174 (c) State Capitol Program 3,035,288 3,035,288
1175 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1176 (1) State General Fund 6,101,650
1177 (2) State General Fund, Transfer 836,604
1178 (3) Accounting and 3,169,712
1179 Administration Fund
1180 (4) Comptroller Revolving Fund, 8,772,450
1181 Estimated
1182 (5) Debt Management Fund, 582,133
1183 Estimated
1184 (6) Finance Director's Revolving 1,014,108
1185 Fund
1186 (7) Office of Indigent Defense 1,690,324
1187 Services Fund, Estimated
1188 (8) State Procurement Fund, 5,486,960
1189 Estimated
Page 42

5,486,960
Estimated
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1190 (9) Capitol Complex Maintenance 36,245,458
1191 and Repair Fund, Estimated
1192 (10) Craft Training Fund, 9,500,000
1193 Estimated
1194 (11) Education Liability Trust 905,820
1195 Fund - Administration
1196 (12) Employee Injury 6,321,843
1197 Compensation Trust Fund -
1198 Administration
1199 As provided in Sections 36-29A-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
1200 (13) General Liability Trust 1,156,106
1201 Fund - Administration
1202 As provided in Sections 36-1-6.1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
1203 (14) Legal Revolving Fund 1,812,614
1204 (15) Mail and Supply Revolving 5,000,000
1205 Fund, Estimated
1206 (16) Personnel Revolving Fund 574,411
1207 (17) Real Property Management 9,165,958
1208 Fund, Estimated
1209 (18) State Business Systems 28,007,850
1210 Fund, Estimated
1211 (19) State Insurance 7,729,055
1212 Fund-Administration
1213 As provided in Sections 41-15-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
1214 Total Finance, Department of 6,938,254 127,134,802 134,073,056
1215 48. Forensic Sciences, Department
1216 of:
1217 (a) Forensic Science Services 28,369,002 12,982,183 41,351,185
1218 Program
1219 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 43

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1220 (1) State General Fund 28,369,002
1221 (2) Chemical Test Fund, 1,153,780
1222 Estimated
1223 As provided in Sections 36-18-51 and 32-5A-191, Code of Alabama 1975.
1224 (3) DNA Fund, Estimated 6,484,394
1225 (4) Federal and Local Funds 2,823,113
1226 (5) Forensic Services Fund, 2,520,896
1227 Estimated
1228 As provided in Sections 36-18-6 through 36-18-8, Code of Alabama 1975.
1229 Total Forensic Sciences, 28,369,002 12,982,183 41,351,185
1230 Department of
1231 49. Foresters, Alabama State Board
1232 of Registration for:
1233 (a) Professional and 200,000 200,000
1234 Occupational Licensing and
1235 Regulation Program
1236 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1237 (1) Professional Foresters Fund 200,000
1238 As provided in Section 34-12-36, Code of Alabama 1975.
1239 Total Foresters, Alabama State 200,000 200,000
1240 Board of Registration for
1241 50. Forestry Commission, Alabama:
1242 (a) Forest Resources Protection 16,109,485 25,323,720 41,433,205
1243 and Development Program
Page 44

16,109,485 25,323,720 41,433,205
and Development Program
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1244 All monies received by the Forestry Commission for Volunteer Fire Departments
1245 or Rural Fire Protection, from whatever source, must be used for those
1246 purposes and an accounting of same shall be filed with both houses of the
1247 Legislature before the third legislative day of the following regular session.
1248 The State Forester shall notify all members of the local legislative
1249 delegation five days prior to the presentation of any funds to any of the
1250 Volunteer Fire Departments within that legislative district. The State
1251 Forester shall make every effort to involve the members of the local
1252 legislative delegation who wish to participate in the presentation of each
1253 grant.
1254 (1) Alabama Fire College Peer 95,000
1255 Support
1256 (2) Forest Products Economic 200,000
1257 Development Specialist
1258 (3) Pinhoti Trail maintenance 250,000
1259 (4) Procurement and 1,000,000
1260 Maintenance of Forest Fire
1261 Fighting Vehicles and
1262 Equipment
1263 (5) Rural and Community Fire 2,000,000
1264 Protection
1265 (6) Woodland grass and brush 300,000
1266 fire equipment
1267 (7) Workforce Development 500,000
1268 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1269 (1) State General Fund - 16,109,485
1270 Transfer
1271 (2) Emergency Forest Fire Fund, 793,139
1272 Estimated
Page 45

793,139
Estimated
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1273 The above appropriation from the Emergency Forest Fire Fund shall be
1274 conditioned as provided by Section 9-3-10.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
1275 (3) Forestry Commission Fund 24,530,581
1276 Total Forestry Commission, Alabama 16,109,485 25,323,720 41,433,205
1277 51. Forever Wild Land Trust, Board
1278 of Trustees:
1279 (a) Capital Outlay Program 16,307,785 16,307,785
1280 (b) Administrative Services 1,615,737 1,615,737
1281 Program
1282 Of the above appropriation to the Administrative Services Program, an amount
1283 equal to 15% of capital outlay expenditures shall be transferred to the
1284 Forever Wild Land Trust Stewardship Account, in accordance with Alabama
1285 Constitution of 2022 §219.07.
1286 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1287 (1) Forever Wild Land Trust Fund 17,923,522
1288 Total Forever Wild Land Trust, 17,923,522 17,923,522
1289 Board of Trustees
1290 The above appropriation is in accordance with Alabama Constitution of 2022 §219.07.
1291 52. Forever Wild Trust Fund,
1292 Stewardship Board:
1293 (a) Alabama Natural Heritage 3,000,000 3,000,000
1294 Program
1295 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1296 (1) Forever Wild Trust Fund 3,000,000
1297 Stewardship Fund, estimated
1298 Total Forever Wild Trust Fund, 3,000,000 3,000,000
1299 Stewardship Board
1300 53. Funeral Services, Alabama
1301 Board of:
Page 46

Board of:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1302 (a) Professional and 1,288,630 1,288,630
1303 Occupational Licensing and
1304 Regulation Program
1305 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1306 (1) Alabama Funeral Directors 1,134,867
1307 and Embalmers Fund
1308 As provided in Section 34-13-23, Code of Alabama 1975.
1309 (2) Funeral Board Property 153,763
1310 Acquisition Fund
1311 Total Funeral Services, Alabama 1,288,630 1,288,630
1312 Board of
1313 54. Genetic Counseling, Alabama
1314 Board of:
1315 (a) Professional and 135,000 135,000
1316 Occupational Licensing and
1317 Regulation Program
1318 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1319 (1) Genetic Counseling Fund 135,000
1320 Total Genetic Counseling, Alabama 135,000 135,000
1321 Board of
1322 55. Geological Survey:
1323 (a) Discovery and Development of 4,686,161 3,673,800 8,359,961
1324 Mineral, Energy and Water
1325 Resources, Geologic Research
1326 and Topographic Mapping
1327 Program
1328 (1) Choctawhatchee, Pea and 457,291
1329 Yellow Rivers Watershed
1330 Management Authority
Page 47

457,291
Management Authority
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1331 To be a program under the State Geologist of the Geological Survey of
1332 Alabama acting in consultation with the Authority.
1333 (2) State Water Assessment 802,750
1334 Program
1335 In coordination with the Office of Water Resources.
1336 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1337 (1) State General Fund 4,686,161
1338 (2) BP Oil Spill Fund 11,000
1339 (3) Federal and Local Funds 3,612,800
1340 (4) Geological Survey Library 50,000
1341 Revolving Fund
1342 Total Geological Survey 4,686,161 3,673,800 8,359,961
1343 56. Geologists, Alabama Board of
1344 Licensure for Professional:
1345 (a) Discovery and Development of 75,000 75,000
1346 Mineral, Energy and Water
1347 Resources, Geologic Research
1348 and Topographic Mapping
1349 Program
1350 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1351 (1) Alabama Board of Licensure 75,000
1352 for Professional Geologists
1353 Fund
1354 As provided in Section 34-41-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
1355 Total Geologists, Alabama Board of 75,000 75,000
1356 Licensure for Professional
1357 57. Governor's Contingency Fund:
1358 (a) Executive Direction Program 110,044 110,044
1359 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1360 (1) State General Fund 110,044
Page 48

(1) State General Fund 110,044
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1361 Total Governor's Contingency Fund 110,044 110,044
1362 Each expenditure from the Contingency Fund, the purpose of each expenditure, and to
1363 whom each payment was made shall be reported on Open.Alabama.gov. The Governor shall
1364 report monthly to the Chair of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee, the
1365 Chair of the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee, and the Legislative
1366 Fiscal Officer each expenditure from the Contingency Fund, the purpose of each
1367 expenditure, and to whom each payment was made.
1368 58. Governor's Mansion Authority:
1369 (a) Historical Resources 1,120,960 1,120,960
1370 Management Program
1371 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1372 (1) State General Fund - 1,120,960
1373 Transfer
1374 Total Governor's Mansion Authority 1,120,960 1,120,960
1375 In fiscal year 2027, the Governor’s Mansion Authority shall report to the Chair of
1376 the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee, the Chair of the Senate Finance and
1377 Taxation-General Fund Committee, Director of Finance, and the Legislative Fiscal
1378 Officer prior to the first day of the 2027 Regular Session regarding amounts
1379 expended and the status of mansion repairs and improvements.
1380 59. Governor's Office:
1381 (a) Executive Direction Program 6,734,957 6,734,957
1382 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1383 (1) State General Fund 6,734,957
1384 Total Governor's Office 6,734,957 6,734,957
1385 60. Governor's Office of Volunteer
1386 Services:
1387 (a) Administrative Support and 132,415 5,038,198 5,170,613
1388 Service Program
1389 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1390 (1) State General Fund 132,415
Page 49

(1) State General Fund 132,415
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1391 (2) Federal and Local Funds 5,038,198
1392 Total Governor's Office of 132,415 5,038,198 5,170,613
1393 Volunteer Services
1394 61. Health, Department of Public:
1395 (a) Administrative Services 18,191,907 33,391,469 51,583,376
1396 Program
1397 (1) Office of Primary Care and 500,000
1398 Rural Health
Page 50

500,000
Rural Health
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1399 For award payments to licensed physicians or nurse practitioners who agree
1400 to practice full-time in primary care in a medically underserved rural area
1401 for an agreed upon number of years. No payment shall be allowed for a
1402 physician or nurse practitioner who has practiced within three years of
1403 October 1, 2026, in a primary care service area with a deficit, or surplus
1404 of less than 2.0 primary-care physicians, as shown by the most-recent Status
1405 Report of the Alabama Primary Care Physician Workforce from the Office for
1406 Family Health Education & Research at the UAB Huntsville Regional Medical
1407 Campus. The Office of Primary Care and Rural Health may pay an eligible
1408 physician or nurse practitioner as much as $50,000 a year for each year of
1409 service, in a medically underserved rural area, agreed to by contract by the
1410 physician or nurse practitioner, but any payment shall be for no more than
1411 three years. Contracts shall set out refund and penalty requirements for
1412 failure by a physician or nurse practitioner to meet the contract terms. A
1413 medically underserved rural area as determined by the Office shall be: (1)
1414 in a rural primary care service area with a deficit of primary-care
1415 physicians as shown by the most recent Status Report of the Alabama Primary
1416 Care Physician Workforce, and (2) in a county in which no more than two
1417 physicians have worked or are scheduled to be working within 12 months to
1418 repay a loan awarded by the Alabama Board of Medical Scholarship Awards. The
1419 Office shall file a report with the Chairs of the Senate Committee on
1420 Finance and Taxation-General Fund and the House Ways and Means-General Fund
1421 Committee, the Legislative Fiscal Officer and the Finance Director by
1422 October 15, 2027, on how the money was spent in fiscal year 2027 and the
1423 names of participants and where they agreed to practice or were practicing
1424 in return for payments from the Office.
1425 (2) Prescription Drug 1,396,916
1426 Monitoring Program
1427 (b) Public Health Services 52,957,332 718,754,172 771,711,504
1428 Program
Page 51

52,957,332 718,754,172 771,711,504
Program
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1429 (1) Addiction Prevention 400,000
1430 Coalition
1431 (2) Alabama Cancer Research 165,000
1432 Consortium
1433 (3) Alabama Rare 100,000
1434 To be used to provide administrative support to the Alabama Rare Disease
1435 Advisory Council (RDAC), as established by Act 2017-109. No later than
1436 September 30, 2027, Alabama Rare shall submit a report to the Legislature
1437 regarding the governance and activities of the RDAC as well as any
1438 recommendations that should be considered to enhance the quality of life for
1439 Alabamians with rare diseases.
1440 (4) Amyotrophic Lateral 750,000
1441 Sclerosis (ALS) Association
1442 For the care and treatment of individuals with ALS and regional
1443 multidisciplinary care clinics.
1444 (5) Association of Free 1,500,000
1445 Clinics
1446 Distributed to the Association based upon an approved plan for expenditures
1447 submitted to the Alabama Department of Public Health.
1448 (6) Breast and Cervical Cancer 600,000
1449 Early Detection Program
1450 (7) Butler County Health 350,000
1451 Department (one-time)
1452 (8) Cancer Wellness Foundation 250,000
1453 (9) Colorectal Cancer and 300,000
1454 Prostate Screenings
1455 (10) Communicable Disease 4,000,000
1456 Program
1457 (11) Decatur Morgan Hospital 950,000
Page 52

(11) Decatur Morgan Hospital 950,000
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1458 (12) Disease Events, Outbreaks, 2,500,000
1459 and Surveillance Activities
1460 Including, but not limited to, the Alabama Drug Assistance Program and other
1461 AIDS programs.
1462 (13) Epilepsy Foundation 150,000
1463 (14) Fetal and Infant Review 25,000
1464 Committee
1465 (15) Forge Breast Cancer 100,000
1466 Survivor Center
1467 (16) Good Samaritan Cullman 500,000
1468 For indigent care.
1469 (17) Hepatitis A and B Vaccines 170,000
1470 To be provided to adults.
1471 (18) Kid One Transport 100,000
1472 (19) Kidney Foundation 225,000
1473 For dialysis patient transportation.
1474 (20) Magic Moments 50,000
1475 (21) Maternal Mortality Review 478,000
1476 Program
1477 (22) Mobile Infirmary 100,000
1478 (23) Office of Data Analytics 1,500,000
1479 (24) Office of Emergency 2,500,000
1480 Medical Services
Page 53

2,500,000
Medical Services
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1481 To award matching grants for ambulances for emergency medical services
1482 operating in rural counties. The Office may consider requests for matching
1483 grants to buy an ambulance, rapid-response vehicle, or cardiac monitor or
1484 other durable medical equipment to be placed in an ambulance or
1485 rapid-response vehicle, from a county, city, hospital, or ambulance service.
1486 The Office may award a grant equal to no more than 75 percent of the cost of
1487 the ambulance, rapid-response vehicle, or equipment, the percentage
1488 depending on the financial resources of the applicant and the need for the
1489 vehicle or equipment as judged by officials with the state’s regional
1490 emergency medical services offices. Preference shall be given to grants for
1491 an ambulance or rapid-response vehicle that would be based in a county with
1492 two or fewer ambulances. The Office shall file a report with the Chairs of
1493 the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-General Fund and the House Ways
1494 and Means-General Fund, the Legislative Fiscal Officer and the Finance
1495 Director by October 15, 2027, on how the money was spent in fiscal year
1496 2027. The report shall list each vehicle or piece of equipment purchased or
1497 planned to be purchased with a grant from the Office, the government or
1498 other organization that bought or planned to buy the vehicle or equipment,
1499 the total cost of the vehicle or equipment and the grant amount awarded to
1500 help pay for it, and why the Office awarded each grant.
1501 (25) Project Help U.S. Medical 250,000
1502 Reserve Corps
1503 (26) Sickle Cell Testing and 750,000
1504 Outreach
1505 (27) UAB TSC Clinic 275,000
1506 (c) Children's Health Insurance 85,464,751 446,393,190 531,857,941
1507 Program
1508 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1509 (1) State General Fund 71,149,239
Page 54

(1) State General Fund 71,149,239
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1510 (2) State General Fund - 85,464,751
1511 Transfer
1512 (3) Cigarette Tax - $0.01 and 6,165,446
1513 $0.02
1514 As provided in Sections 40-25-2 and 40-25-23, Code of Alabama 1975.
1515 (4) Controlled Substance 726,082
1516 Database Fund
1517 (5) Federal Funds 477,218,671
1518 (6) Miscellaneous Funds 77,633,815
1519 (7) Emergency Medical Fund 541,352
1520 (8) Hospital Licenses Fund 2,300,391
1521 (9) Local Health Departments 174,509,194
1522 Fund
1523 (10) Milk Processing Fund 154,851
1524 (11) Plan Review Fund 938,973
1525 (12) Public Health Management 51,556
1526 Entity Fund
1527 (13) Radiation Safety Fund 3,581,016
1528 (14) Vital Statistics Fund 8,324,294
1529 (15) Federal Funds - CHIP 446,393,190
1530 Total Health, Department of Public 156,613,990 1,198,538,831 1,355,152,821
1531 The Department of Public Health will reimburse the Alabama Medicaid Agency the state
1532 match necessary to cover increased revenues for services as a result of fee
1533 increases. The Department of Public Health will be responsible to the Alabama
1534 Medicaid Agency for any disallowance of Public Health Department costs as a result
1535 of federal or state audits. In addition to the above appropriations to the
1536 Department of Public Health, there is hereby appropriated such funds as become
1537 available from the Penny Trust Fund for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027,
1538 pursuant to Section 41-15A-2, Code of Alabama 1975, and Alabama Constitution of
1539 2022 §219.06.
Page 55

2022 §219.06.
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1540 62. Health Planning Agency, State:
1541 (a) Health Planning Development 8,478 1,816,045 1,824,523
1542 and Regulation Program
1543 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1544 (1) State General Fund 8,478
1545 (2) Departmental Receipts 1,816,045
1546 Total Health Planning Agency, 8,478 1,816,045 1,824,523
1547 State
1548 63. Hearing Instrument Dealers,
1549 Alabama Board of:
1550 (a) Professional and 60,000 60,000
1551 Occupational Licensing and
1552 Regulation Program
1553 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1554 (1) Hearing Instrument Dealers 60,000
1555 Fund
1556 As provided in Section 34-14-33, Code of Alabama 1975.
1557 Total Hearing Instrument Dealers, 60,000 60,000
1558 Alabama Board of
1559 64. Heating, Air Conditioning, and
1560 Refrigeration Contractors,
1561 Board of:
1562 (a) Professional and 1,664,000 1,664,000
1563 Occupational Licensing and
1564 Regulation Program
1565 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1566 (1) Heating and Air Conditioning 1,664,000
1567 Contractors Fund
1568 As provided in Sections 34-31-18 through 34-31-34, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 56

As provided in Sections 34-31-18 through 34-31-34, Code of Alabama 1975.
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1569 Total Heating, Air Conditioning, 1,664,000 1,664,000
1570 and Refrigeration Contractors,
1571 Board of
1572 65. Historical Commission,
1573 Alabama:
1574 (a) Historical Resources 6,251,876 7,168,325 13,420,201
1575 Management Program
1576 (1) Alabama Veterans Museum 60,000
1577 and Archives
1578 (2) Arlington House 25,000
1579 (3) Ballard House 25,000
1580 (4) Brierfield Ironworks 50,000
1581 Historical State Park
1582 (5) Community Foundation of 50,000
1583 Northeast Alabama
1584 (6) Eufaula Heritage 50,000
1585 Association
1586 (7) Friends of Ackerville 75,000
1587 Baptist Church
1588 (8) Historic Blakeley 1,025,000
1589 Authority
1590 (9) Historic Fendall Hall - 50,000
1591 Eufaula
1592 (10) Historic First Baptist 40,000
1593 Church of Selma
1594 (11) Historic Holman House - 100,000
1595 Ozark
1596 (12) Historical Commission, 4,258,784
1597 Alabama
Page 57

4,258,784
Alabama
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1598 (13) Historical Commission, 223,092
1599 Alabama - Governor's
1600 Mansion and State Capitol
1601 (14) Museum of East Alabama 50,000
1602 (15) Pioneer Museum - Troy 20,000
1603 (16) St. Stephens Historical 50,000
1604 Commission
1605 (17) Swift-Cole House - Baldwin 50,000
1606 County
1607 (18) Tannehill Ironworks 50,000
1608 Historical State Park
1609 (b) Capital Outlay Program 8,692,000 8,692,000
1610 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1611 (1) State General Fund - 6,251,876
1612 Transfer
1613 (2) Alabama State Historical 10,085,325
1614 Preservation Fund -
1615 Departmental Receipts
1616 (3) Federal and Local Funds 5,000,000
1617 (4) Soldiers Fund 775,000
1618 As provided in Section 40-8-3, Code of Alabama 1975.
1619 Total Historical Commission, 6,251,876 15,860,325 22,112,201
1620 Alabama
1621 66. Historic Ironworks Commission:
1622 (a) Historical Resources 2,421,424 2,421,424
1623 Management Program
1624 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1625 (1) Alabama Historical Ironworks 2,421,424
1626 Commission
Page 58

2,421,424
Commission
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1627 Total Historic Ironworks 2,421,424 2,421,424
1628 Commission
1629 67. Home Builders Licensure Board:
1630 (a) Professional and 6,025,000 6,025,000
1631 Occupational Licensing and
1632 Regulation Program
1633 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1634 (1) Home Builders Licensure 4,825,000
1635 Board Fund
1636 In accordance with Sections 34-14A-1 through 34-14A-17, Code of Alabama 1975.
1637 (2) Home Builders Licensure 500,000
1638 Board Recovery Fund
1639 (3) Home Builders Property 700,000
1640 Acquisition Fund
1641 Total Home Builders Licensure 6,025,000 6,025,000
1642 Board
1643 68. Home Medical Equipment
1644 Services Providers, Board of:
1645 (a) Professional and 356,200 356,200
1646 Occupational Licensing and
1647 Regulation Program
1648 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1649 (1) Home Medical Equipment 356,200
1650 Services Fund
1651 In accordance with Sections 34-14C-1 to 34-14C-8, Code of Alabama 1975.
1652 Total Home Medical Equipment 356,200 356,200
1653 Services Providers, Board of
1654 69. Human Resources, Department
1655 of:
1656 (a) Human Services Program 149,100,857 2,863,424,641 3,012,525,498
Page 59

(a) Human Services Program 149,100,857 2,863,424,641 3,012,525,498
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1657 (1) Alabama CASA Network, Inc. 500,000
1658 To be expended for Court-Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) Programs. The
1659 above entity shall file a report with the Chairs of the House Ways and
1660 Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and Taxation-General
1661 Fund Committee and the Legislative Fiscal Officer by the first day of the
1662 2027 Regular Session regarding the expenditure and usage of the funds
1663 appropriated in fiscal year 2027.
1664 (2) Alabama Network of 1,850,000
1665 Children's Advocacy Centers
1666 (3) Alabama Network of Family 2,025,000 1,350,000
1667 Resource Centers
Page 60

2,025,000 1,350,000
Resource Centers
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1668 Of the above appropriation from the State General Fund, $1,800,000 shall be
1669 distributed equally to the 26 current members of the Alabama Network of
1670 Family Resource Centers and to 1 emerging site which is Family Services
1671 Center Barbour County / Clearinghouse in Barbour County. Funding from DHR
1672 contingent upon current centers remaining in good standing with the Alabama
1673 Network of Family Resource Centers and the emerging sites progressing
1674 towards membership and in good standing with the Alabama Network of Family
1675 Resource Centers.
1676
1677 Of the above appropriation from Other Funds, $1,350,000 of the Temporary
1678 Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) funds shall be distributed equally to
1679 the 26 current members of the Alabama Network of Family Resource Centers and
1680 to 1 emerging site which is Family Services Center Barbour County /
1681 Clearinghouse in Barbour County. Funding from DHR contingent upon current
1682 centers remaining in good standing with the Alabama Network of Family
1683 Resource Centers and the emerging sites progressing towards membership and
1684 in good standing with the Alabama Network of Family Resource Centers.
1685
1686 The Family Resource Centers shall expend these funds to assist the
1687 Department in moving individuals and families into Alabama’s workforce and
1688 facilitating economic security and to serve these families by providing
1689 resources and removing barriers to accomplish these outcomes. The Family
1690 Resource Centers, current and emerging, shall provide reports and/or
1691 information per the Department’s request to ensure accountability of these
1692 funds. The Department shall provide to the Chairs of the House Ways and
1693 Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and Taxation-General
1694 Fund Committee and the Legislative Fiscal Officer a report by the first day
1695 of the 2027 Regular Session regarding the expenditure and usage of the funds
1696 appropriated above to the Family Resource Centers in fiscal year 2027.
Page 61

appropriated above to the Family Resource Centers in fiscal year 2027.
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1697 (4) Alabama Sheriff's Youth 300,000
1698 Ranch
1699 The above entity shall file a report with the Chairs of the House Ways and
1700 Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and Taxation-General
1701 Fund Committee and the Legislative Fiscal Officer by the first day of the
1702 2027 Regular Session regarding the expenditure and usage of the funds
1703 appropriated in fiscal year 2027.
1704 (5) Boys and Girls Clubs of 210,000 1,800,000
1705 Alabama
1706 Of this amount, $210,000 shall be from the State General Fund and
1707 $1,800,000 from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF). To be
1708 expended exclusively to contract with the Boys and Girls Clubs of Alabama
1709 for TANF approved programs. The Boys and Girls Clubs of Alabama shall
1710 provide reports and/or information, per the Department's request, and/or
1711 contract to enhance accountability of any TANF funds. The Department shall
1712 provide to the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and
1713 the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee and the Legislative
1714 Fiscal Officer a report by the first day of the 2027 Regular Session on the
1715 individual contracts and amounts and the expenditure usage of the funds
1716 appropriated above to the Boys and Girls Clubs of Alabama.
1717 a. A.G. Gaston Boys and Girls 10,000
1718 Club
1719 b. Boys and Girls Club of 200,000
1720 North Alabama for the
1721 Abington Street Club
1722 (6) Heart Gallery Alabama 75,000
1723 (7) Transportation Pilot 450,000
1724 Program
Page 62

450,000
Program
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1725 For SAFE, Mary Hill Family Services Center, and Circle of Care Center for
1726 Families.
1727 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1728 (1) State General Fund - 149,100,857
1729 Transfer
1730 (2) Pension Residue 20,773,500
1731 (3) ABC Profits 1,102,107
1732 (4) Beer Tax, Estimated 11,893,000
1733 (5) Child Support Collections, 300,000
1734 Estimated
1735 (6) Cigarette Tax, Estimated 2,400,000
1736 (7) Contractor's Gross Receipts 6,309,589
1737 Tax, Estimated
1738 (8) Federal and Local Funds 2,577,621,960
1739 (9) Fortified Wine, Estimated 500,000
1740 (10) Foster Care Trust Fund 50,000
1741 (11) Miscellaneous Receipts, 2,344,966
1742 Estimated
1743 (12) Public Welfare Trust Fund 35,134,920
1744 Unencumbered Balance Brought
1745 Forward, Estimated
1746 (13) Sales Tax 1,322,000
1747 (14) Sales Tax for Food Stamps, 123,849,092
1748 Estimated
1749 In accordance with Section 40-23-35, Code of Alabama 1975.
1750 (15) Transfer from Facilitation 2,239,203
1751 Team Agencies, Estimated
1752 (16) Use Tax for Foster Care 500,000
1753 (17) Whiskey Tax, Estimated 77,084,304
Page 63

(17) Whiskey Tax, Estimated 77,084,304
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1754 Total Human Resources, Department 149,100,857 2,863,424,641 3,012,525,498
1755 of
1756 No later than October 1, 2026, the Department of Human Resources shall develop a
1757 plan to modify SNAP benefits or eligibility as necessary to cover any penalty
1758 imposed on the state in fiscal year 2028 due to the SNAP error rate not being less
1759 than 6% for fiscal year 2026, pursuant to Public Law 119-21.
1760 No funds from the sales tax for the issuance of food stamps shall be reverted by the
1761 Department of Human Resources to the Education Trust Fund. Any funds appropriated
1762 which are in excess of the amount needed to fund the food stamp program shall be
1763 retained by the Department and expended for direct services to children, including
1764 the TANF program.
1765 70. Indian Affairs Commission,
1766 Alabama:
1767 (a) Social Services Program 563,348 563,348
1768 The above appropriation is to be expended in accordance with Sections
1769 41-9-708, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
1770 (1) Mowa Band of Indians 175,000
1771 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1772 (1) State General Fund 563,348
1773 Total Indian Affairs Commission, 563,348 563,348
1774 Alabama
1775 71. Industrial Development
1776 Authority, State:
1777 (a) Industrial Development 68,320,000 68,320,000
1778 Program
1779 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1780 (1) Alabama Capital Improvement 2,000,000
1781 Trust Fund
1782 (2) Alabama Energy 16,000,000
1783 Infrastructure Fund
Page 64

16,000,000
Infrastructure Fund
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1784 (3) SIDA Application Fees Fund 320,000
1785 (4) Stategic Energy 50,000,000
1786 Infrastructure Development
1787 Fund
1788 Total Industrial Development 68,320,000 68,320,000
1789 Authority, State
1790 72. Information Technology, Office
1791 of:
1792 (a) Administrative Support 2,926,615 94,893,359 97,819,974
1793 Services Program
1794 (1) Cybersecurity 2,926,615
1795 The Office of Information Technology shall report semi-annually to the Chair
1796 of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee, the Chair of the Senate
1797 Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee, Director of Finance, and the
1798 Legislative Fiscal Officer on the status of the updates to the state’s
1799 cybersecurity system.
1800 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1801 (1) State General Fund - 2,926,615
1802 Transfer
1803 (2) Telecommunications Revolving 94,893,359
1804 Fund, Estimated
1805 Total Information Technology, 2,926,615 94,893,359 97,819,974
1806 Office of
1807 Pursuant to Sections 41-28-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
1808 73. Insurance Board, State
1809 Employees':
1810 (a) Administrative Support 9,447,074 9,447,074
1811 Services Program
1812 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 65

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1813 (1) State Employees' Insurance 9,447,074
1814 Board Expense Fund
1815 Total Insurance Board, State 9,447,074 9,447,074
1816 Employees'
1817 74. Insurance, Department of:
1818 (a) Regulatory Services Program 92,234,312 92,234,312
1819 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1820 (1) Center for Risk and 1,500,000
1821 Insurance Research Fund
1822 (2) Fire Marshal's Fund 713,760
1823 As provided in Sections 34-33-11, 8-17-211, and 8-17-255, Code of Alabama
1824 1975.
1825 (3) Insurance Department Fund 57,155,504
1826 As provided in Section 27-2-39, Code of Alabama 1975.
1827 (4) Insurance Fraud Unit Fund 334,166
1828 As provided in Sections 27-12A-1 through 27-12A-42, Code of Alabama 1975.
1829 (5) Reduced Cigarette Ignition 45,150
1830 Propensity Standards and
1831 Firefighter Protection Act
1832 Fund
1833 As provided in Section 8-17-278, Code of Alabama 1975.
1834 (6) Service Contract Fund 52,457
1835 As provided in Section 8-32-3, Code of Alabama 1975.
1836 (7) Special Examination 15,433,275
1837 Revolving Fund
1838 (8) Strengthen Alabama Homes 17,000,000
1839 Fund
1840 As provided in Section 27-31E-2, Code of Alabama 1975.
1841 Total Insurance, Department of 92,234,312 92,234,312
Page 66

Total Insurance, Department of 92,234,312 92,234,312
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1842 75. Interior Designers, Alabama
1843 Board for Registered:
1844 (a) Professional and 50,000 50,000
1845 Occupational Licensing and
1846 Regulation Program
1847 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1848 (1) Interior Design Fund 50,000
1849 As provided in Section 34-15C-14, Code of Alabama 1975.
1850 Total Interior Designers, Alabama 50,000 50,000
1851 Board for Registered
1852 76. Interpreters and
1853 Transliterators, Alabama
1854 Licensure Board for:
1855 (a) Professional and 95,000 95,000
1856 Occupational Licensing and
1857 Regulation Program
1858 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1859 (1) Alabama Licensure Board for 95,000
1860 Interpreters and
1861 Transliterators Fund
1862 As provided in Section 34-16-9, Code of Alabama 1975.
1863 Total Interpreters and 95,000 95,000
1864 Transliterators, Alabama Licensure
1865 Board for
1866 77. Landscape Architects, Board of
1867 Examiners of:
1868 (a) Professional and 95,000 95,000
1869 Occupational Licensing and
1870 Regulation Program
1871 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 67

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1872 (1) Landscape Architect's Fund 95,000
1873 As provided in Section 34-17-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
1874 Total Landscape Architects, Board 95,000 95,000
1875 of Examiners of
1876 78. Law Enforcement Agency, State:
1877 (a) Department of Public Safety 98,453,135 41,938,741 140,391,876
1878 Program
1879 (1) Alabama Statewide 1,100,000
1880 Emergency Notification
1881 System
1882 To be expended in coordination with the Emergency Management Agency for
1883 ongoing maintenance cost for the system implemented in 2026.
1884 (b) State Bureau of 12,138,117 34,928,785 47,066,902
1885 Investigation Program
1886 (1) Alabama Human Trafficking 100,000
1887 Partnership
1888 (2) Alabama Metro Crime 3,000,000
1889 Suppression Unit
1890 (3) Vaping Enforcement 200,000
1891 (c) Administrative Bureau 32,948,104 54,610,303 87,558,407
1892 Program
1893 (1) Capitol Security 1,500,000
1894 (2) Helicopter flight time for 600,000
1895 safety flights along the
1896 Gulf Coast
1897 (3) State House Security 700,000
1898 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1899 (1) State General Fund - 143,539,356
1900 Transfer
Page 68

143,539,356
Transfer
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1901 (2) Federal and Local Funds 38,691,985
1902 (3) Impaired Driving Prevention 407,050
1903 and Enforcement Fund
1904 (4) Interlock Ignition Fund 140,000
1905 (5) Miscellaneous Funds 3,126,009
1906 (6) Transfer from Highway 52,435,050
1907 Traffic Safety Fund
1908 (7) Transfer from Marine Police 8,345,387
1909 Fund
1910 (8) Transfer from Motor Vehicle 1,200,000
1911 License Fees
1912 (9) DPS Automated Fingerprint 2,744,044
1913 Identification System
1914 (10) Transfer from ABC Board 17,712,246
1915 Fund
1916 (11) Transfer from ACJIC 5,176,058
1917 Automation Fund
1918 (12) Motor Vehicle Replacement 1,000,000
1919 Fund
1920 (13) ABC Seizure Fund 45,000
1921 (14) DOJ Equitable Sharing Funds 250,000
1922 (15) Treasury Equity Sharing 205,000
1923 Funds
1924 Total Law Enforcement Agency, 143,539,356 131,477,829 275,017,185
1925 State
1926 79. Lieutenant Governor, Office of
1927 the:
1928 (a) Legislative Operations and 705,160 705,160
1929 Support Program
1930 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 69

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1931 (1) State General Fund 705,160
1932 Total Lieutenant Governor, Office 705,160 705,160
1933 of the
1934 80. Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board:
1935 (a) Regulatory Services Program 2,595,732 2,595,732
1936 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1937 (1) Liquefied Petroleum Gas 2,395,732
1938 Board Fund
1939 (2) Liquefied Petroleum Gas 200,000
1940 Research and Education Fund
1941 Total Liquefied Petroleum Gas 2,595,732 2,595,732
1942 Board
1943 81. Manufactured Housing
1944 Commission, Advisory Board:
1945 (a) Regulatory Services Program 4,986,059 4,986,059
1946 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1947 (1) Alabama Manufactured Housing 4,986,059
1948 Commission Fund
1949 As provided in Section 24-6-4, Code of Alabama 1975.
1950 Total Manufactured Housing 4,986,059 4,986,059
1951 Commission, Advisory Board
1952 82. Marriage and Family Therapy,
1953 Board of Examiners in:
1954 (a) Professional and 100,000 100,000
1955 Occupational Licensing and
1956 Regulation Program
1957 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1958 (1) Board of Examiners in 100,000
1959 Marriage and Family Therapy
1960 Fund
Page 70

100,000
Fund
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1961 As provided in Section 34-17A-25, Code of Alabama 1975.
1962 Total Marriage and Family Therapy, 100,000 100,000
1963 Board of Examiners in
1964 83. Massage Therapy, Alabama Board
1965 of:
1966 (a) Professional and 652,000 652,000
1967 Occupational Licensing and
1968 Regulation Program
1969 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1970 (1) Alabama Board of Massage 652,000
1971 Therapy Fund
1972 As provided in Section 34-43A-12, Code of Alabama 1975.
1973 Total Massage Therapy, Alabama 652,000 652,000
1974 Board of
1975 84. Medicaid Agency, Alabama:
1976 (a) Medical Assistance through 1,179,054,000 9,338,373,438 10,517,427,438
1977 Medicaid Program
Page 71

1,179,054,000 9,338,373,438 10,517,427,438
Medicaid Program
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1978 The Medicaid Agency will reimburse the Department of Public Health for
1979 actual costs (in compliance with OMB Circular A-87 and Centers for Medicare
1980 and Medicaid Services guidelines) for services provided. The Department of
1981 Public Health shall transfer to the Medicaid Agency the state funds
1982 attributable to the difference between their costs and Medicaid's routine
1983 reimbursement fee. The Medicaid Agency shall make every effort to maintain
1984 level funding for the adult prosthetic and orthotic program in fiscal year
1985 2027. Any requirements for prior authorization of antipsychotic drugs will be
1986 for the limited purpose of managing off-label utilization. The Medicaid Agency
1987 shall make every effort to provide access for medications prescribed in
1988 accordance with FDA approved indications for mental illness and HIV/AIDS. The
1989 Alabama Medicaid Agency shall not pay for a generic drug that is more
1990 expensive than its brand name drug, net of rebates. The Alabama Medicaid
1991 Agency shall continue to fund and support the PACE program in accordance with
1992 written agreements.
1993 (1) Dental Services Project 50,000
1994 for Handicapped/Indigent
1995 Patients
1996 (2) Payment of Hospital 15,000,000
1997 Inpatient and Outpatient
1998 Services
1999 For the purposes of state share and the related federal matching funds for
2000 payment of hospital inpatient and outpatient services delivered in Alabama
2001 by hospitals as defined by 42 U.S. Code Chapter 7, Subchapter XVIII, Part E,
2002 §1395ww(d)(1)(B)(iii) and who participate directly as qualified entities to
2003 receive funding under 42 U.S. Code, Chapter 6A, Subchapter II, Part D,
2004 Subpart ix, §256e. This appropriation shall be separate from and in addition
2005 to funds described in Alabama Code Title 40 Chapter 26B Article 5.
Page 72

to funds described in Alabama Code Title 40 Chapter 26B Article 5.
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2006 (3) Payment of Hospital 7,000,000
2007 Inpatient and Outpatient
2008 Services Delivered in
2009 Alabama by Rural Hospitals
2010 For the purposes of state share and the related federal matching funds for
2011 payment of hospital inpatient and outpatient services delivered in Alabama
2012 by rural hospitals. Rural hospitals shall be defined as those hospitals
2013 whose hospital physical address qualifies for the definition of CMS Rural
2014 for Rural Health Clinics Program. This appropriation shall be separate from
2015 and in addition to funds described in Alabama Code Title 40 Chapter 26B
2016 Article 5.
2017 (4) Post Partum Coverage Pilot 4,000,000
2018 Project
2019 For a pilot project to extend postpartum coverage from 60 days to 12 months.
2020 It is the intent of the Legislature to view this coverage as a pilot program
2021 for the Alabama Medicaid Agency to review and assess costs, postpartum
2022 services utilization, and health outcomes.
2023 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2024 (1) State General Fund 1,179,054,000
2025 (2) Alabama Health Care Trust 433,788,152
2026 Fund, Estimated
2027 (3) Certified Public 3,216,748
2028 Expenditures, Estimated
2029 (4) Court Ordered Settlements 1,541,192
2030 (5) Departmental Receipts, 12,269,650
2031 Estimated
2032 (6) Drug Rebates, Estimated 163,169,407
2033 (7) Federal and Local Funds 7,464,810,109
2034 (8) Intergovernmental Transfers, 641,411,850
2035 Estimated
Page 73

641,411,850
Estimated
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2036 (9) Medicaid Emergency Reserve 100,000,000
2037 Fund
2038 (10) Transfer from Department of 27,736,403
2039 Human Resources
2040 (11) Transfer from Department of 235,361,774
2041 Mental Health
2042 (12) Transfer from Department of 33,434,371
2043 Public Health
2044 (13) Transfer from Department of 11,635,381
2045 Rehabilitation Services
2046 (14) Transfer from Department of 33,475,718
2047 Senior Services
2048 (15) Transfer from Department of 4,622,368
2049 Youth Services
2050 (16) Transfer from Medicaid 26,227,165
2051 Trust Fund, Estimated
2052 (17) Transfer from Public 51,820,524
2053 Schools, Estimated
2054 (18) Unencumbered Balance 93,852,626
2055 Brought Forward, Estimated
2056 Total Medicaid Agency, Alabama 1,179,054,000 9,338,373,438 10,517,427,438
2057 85. Medical Cannabis Commission,
2058 Alabama:
2059 (a) Professional and 1,000,000 2,000,000 3,000,000
2060 Occupational Licensing and
2061 Regulation Program
2062 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2063 (1) State General Fund 1,000,000
2064 (2) Medical Cannabis Commission 2,000,000
2065 Fund
Page 74

2,000,000
Fund
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2066 Total Medical Cannabis Commission, 1,000,000 2,000,000 3,000,000
2067 Alabama
2068 86. Mental Health, Department of:
2069 (a) Substance Abuse Program 9,900,542 106,204,369 116,104,911
2070 (1) Calhoun County Substance 135,000
2071 Abuse Prevention Services
2072 (2) Community Provider Rate 3,482,142
2073 Increase
2074 (b) Administrative Services 7,088,451 33,313,847 40,402,298
2075 Program
2076 (c) Special Services Program 6,284,484 11,534,249 17,818,733
2077 (1) Alabama Interagency Autism 60,000
2078 Coordinating Council
2079 (2) Substance Abuse Prevention 310,000
2080 Services
2081 (3) For services to Children 4,750,000
2082 and Youth with Severe
2083 Emotional Disturbance or
2084 Autism Spectrum Disorder
2085 (d) Institutional Treatment and 64,291,228 634,117,426 698,408,654
2086 Care of Intellectually
2087 Disabled Program
2088 (1) Residential Habilitation 1,237,025
2089 Provider Rates Increase
2090 (2) Community Provider Rate 11,071,429
2091 Increase
2092 (e) Institutional Treatment and 153,299,844 346,479,007 499,778,851
2093 Care of Mental Illness
2094 Program
Page 75

153,299,844 346,479,007 499,778,851
Program
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2095 (1) Anti-Eviction Defense 650,000
2096 Program
2097 (2) Black Women's Mental 100,000
2098 Health
2099 (3) Civil Commitment / 8,000,000
2100 Residential Services
2101 To increase the number of civil commitment beds and prevent the loss of
2102 current civil commitment beds due to lack of financial sustainability.
2103 (4) Increase the number of 2,500,000
2104 civil commitment beds above
2105 the funded amount in FY26
2106 (5) Community Mental Health 6,250,000
2107 Centers
2108 The funding provided in this act for community mental health centers shall
2109 be combined with $5,750,000 of the funding provided in the Education Trust
2110 Fund appropriations act, so that a total of at least $10,000,000 in state
2111 funds is allocated to community mental health centers.
2112 (6) Crisis Intervention 1,000,000
2113 Training Program
2114 (7) Existing Six Crisis 36,000,000
2115 Diversion Centers within
2116 the State
Page 76

36,000,000
the State
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2117 The Department shall provide the following prior to the start of the 2027
2118 Regular Session: (1) a report to the Chair of the House Ways and
2119 Means-General Fund Committee, the Chair of the Senate Finance and
2120 Taxation-General Fund Committee, the Director of Finance, and the
2121 Legislative Fiscal Officer regarding the status of construction of each
2122 center and, if completed, the operating expenses of each center, including
2123 the number of employees, and the number of persons served at each center;
2124 and (2) allow the Commission on the Evaluation of Services to have access to
2125 the centers for purposes of evaluation.
2126 (8) Existing Five Rural Crisis 6,000,000
2127 Care Programs
2128 The Department shall provide the following prior to the start of the 2027
2129 Regular Session: (1) a report to the Chair of the House Ways and
2130 Means-General Fund Committee, the Chair of the Finance and Taxation-General
2131 Fund Committee, the Director of Finance, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer
2132 regarding the status of construction, if any, for the five programs and, if
2133 completed, the operating expenses of the programs, including the number of
2134 employees, and the number of persons served through each program; and (2)
2135 allow the Commission on the Evaluation of Services to have access to the
2136 programs for purposes of evaluation.
2137 (9) Pilot Program for Mobile 5,000,000
2138 Crisis Centers for Children
2139 and Adolescents
2140 In fiscal year 2027, the Department shall report to the Chair of the House
2141 Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Chair of the Senate Finance
2142 and Taxation-General Fund Committee, the Finance Director, and the
2143 Legislative Fiscal Officer regarding the expenses of the pilot program,
2144 including the number of employees, and the number of persons served by the
2145 mobile crisis centers.
Page 77

mobile crisis centers.
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2146 (10) Stepping Up Initiative 1,829,250
2147 Expansion
2148 (11) To Comply with the Terms 3,715,000
2149 of the Consent Decree in
2150 Hunter v. Beshear
2151 (12) Veteran's PTSD Treatment 200,000
2152 Program
2153 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2154 (1) State General Fund - 240,864,549
2155 Transfer
2156 (2) Federal and Local Funds, 882,688,378
2157 Estimated
2158 (3) Indigent Offender 115,000
2159 Alcohol/Drug Treatment Fund
2160 (4) Special Mental Health Trust 243,206,985
2161 Fund, Estimated
2162 (5) Cigarette Tax 4,018,178
2163 (6) Departmental Receipts 1,495,357
2164 (7) Alabama Behavioral Analyst 40,000
2165 Licensing Board Fund
2166 (8) Mental Health Contingency 85,000
2167 Fund
2168 Total Mental Health, Department of 240,864,549 1,131,648,898 1,372,513,447
2169 87. Midwifery, State Board of:
2170 (a) Alabama State Board of 25,000 25,000
2171 Midwifery Program
2172 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2173 (1) State Board of Midwifery 25,000
2174 Fund
2175 As provided in Section 34-19-13, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 78

As provided in Section 34-19-13, Code of Alabama 1975.
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2176 Total Midwifery, State Board of 25,000 25,000
2177 88. Military Department:
2178 (a) Military Operations Program 11,939,501 11,939,501
2179 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2180 (1) State General Fund - Active 3,222
2181 Military Service
2182 (2) State General Fund - JEEP 313,334
2183 Program
2184 (3) State General Fund - 10,405,478
2185 Operations
2186 (4) State General Fund - State 1,217,467
2187 Share Utilities
2188 Total Military Department 11,939,501 11,939,501
2189 89. Military Department - Armory
2190 Commission of Alabama:
2191 (a) Military Operations Program 83,987,110 83,987,110
2192 (b) Capital Outlay Program 4,000,000 7,500,000 11,500,000
2193 (1) Armory Maintenance and 1,000,000
2194 Revitalization
2195 In fiscal year 2027, the Military Department-Armory Commission shall report
2196 to the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the
2197 Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee, the Director of Finance,
2198 and the Legislative Fiscal Officer regarding the physical condition of the
2199 armories and the expenditure and use of these funds.
2200 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2201 (1) State General Fund 4,000,000
2202 (2) Federal and Local Funds 79,378,943
2203 (3) Federal Counter Drug - US 39,000
2204 Attorney Fund
2205 (4) Military - Federal Air Fund 10,352,167
Page 79

(4) Military - Federal Air Fund 10,352,167
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2206 (5) Military Department 1,717,000
2207 Billeting Revolving Fund,
2208 Estimated
2209 Total Military Department - Armory 4,000,000 91,487,110 95,487,110
2210 Commission of Alabama
2211 90. Nursing Home Administrators,
2212 Board of Examiners of:
2213 (a) Professional and 120,000 120,000
2214 Occupational Licensing and
2215 Regulation Program
2216 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2217 (1) Board of Examiners of 120,000
2218 Nursing Home Administrators
2219 Fund
2220 As provided in Section 34-20-7, Code of Alabama 1975.
2221 Total Nursing Home Administrators, 120,000 120,000
2222 Board of Examiners of
2223 91. Occupational Therapy, Alabama
2224 State Board of:
2225 (a) Professional and 427,698 427,698
2226 Occupational Licensing and
2227 Regulation Program
2228 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2229 (1) Board of Occupational 427,698
2230 Therapy Fund
2231 As provided in Section 34-39-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
2232 Total Occupational Therapy, 427,698 427,698
2233 Alabama State Board of
2234 92. Oil and Gas Board:
Page 80

92. Oil and Gas Board:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2235 (a) Management and Regulation of 4,237,827 797,319 5,035,146
2236 Oil and Gas Exploration and
2237 Development Program
2238 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2239 (1) State General Fund 4,237,827
2240 (2) Oil and Gas Board Special 747,319
2241 Fund
2242 (3) Surety Bond Deposits, 50,000
2243 Estimated
2244 As provided in Section 9-17-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
2245 Total Oil and Gas Board 4,237,827 797,319 5,035,146
2246 93. Onsite Wastewater Board,
2247 Alabama:
2248 (a) Professional and 723,449 723,449
2249 Occupational Licensing and
2250 Regulation Program
2251 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2252 (1) Alabama Onsite Wastewater 723,449
2253 Fund
2254 As provided in Section 34-21A-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
2255 Total Onsite Wastewater Board, 723,449 723,449
2256 Alabama
2257 94. Optometry, Alabama Board Of:
2258 (a) Professional and 451,362 451,362
2259 Occupational Licensing and
2260 Regulation Program
2261 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2262 (1) Optometry Board Fund 451,362
2263 Total Optometry, Alabama Board Of 451,362 451,362
2264 95. Pardons and Paroles, Board of:
Page 81

95. Pardons and Paroles, Board of:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2265 (a) Administration of Pardons 90,647,110 9,100,000 99,747,110
2266 and Paroles Program
2267 (1) Alabama Prison Arts and 200,000
2268 Education Project
2269 (2) Electronic Monitoring 800,000
2270 Program
2271 (3) Program to Support Small 125,000
2272 Business Development by
2273 Ex-offenders
2274 In collaboration with the Department of Corrections.
2275 (4) Reentry Services Program 100,000
2276 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2277 (1) State General Fund 90,647,110
2278 (2) Probationers Upkeep Fund, 9,100,000
2279 Estimated
2280 As provided in Section 15-22-2, Code of Alabama 1975.
2281 Total Pardons and Paroles, Board 90,647,110 9,100,000 99,747,110
2282 of
2283 96. Peace Officers' Annuity and
2284 Benefit Fund Board, Alabama:
2285 (a) Retirement Systems Program 1,189,000 1,189,000
2286 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2287 (1) Peace Officers' Annuity and 1,189,000
2288 Benefit Fund
2289 As provided in Section 36-21-66, Code of Alabama 1975.
2290 Total Peace Officers' Annuity and 1,189,000 1,189,000
2291 Benefit Fund Board, Alabama
2292 97. Personnel Department, State:
Page 82

97. Personnel Department, State:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2293 (a) Administrative Support 13,000,000 13,000,000
2294 Services Program
2295 Transfers to the State Personnel Department shall be as follows:
2296 (1) Agriculture and 144,874
2297 Industries, Department of
2298 (2) Alcoholic Beverage Control 371,361
2299 Board
2300 (3) Soil and Water 3,514
2301 Conservation Committee,
2302 State
2303 (4) Agricultural and 1,952
2304 Conservation Development
2305 Commission
2306 (5) Agricultural Museum Board 781
2307 (6) Alabama Office of Minority 1,952
2308 Affairs
2309 (7) Architects, Board of 1,562
2310 Registration of
2311 (8) Archives and History, 29,287
2312 Department of
2313 (9) Arts, Alabama State 5,857
2314 Council on the
2315 (10) Attorney General, Office 67,165
2316 of the
2317 (11) Auditor, State 3,514
2318 (12) Bail Bonding Board, 390
2319 Alabama Professional
2320 (13) Banking Department, State 37,878
Page 83

(13) Banking Department, State 37,878
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2321 (14) Child Abuse and Neglect 10,153
2322 Prevention, Department of
2323 (15) Chiropractic Examiners, 2,733
2324 Alabama State Board of
2325 (16) Choctawhatchee, Pea and 1,171
2326 Yellow Rivers Watershed
2327 Management Authority
2328 (17) Commerce, Department of 26,944
2329 (18) Conservation and Natural 523,264
2330 Resources, Department of
2331 (19) Corrections, Department of 1,339,399
2332 (20) Cosmetology, Alabama Board 10,543
2333 of
2334 (21) Ethics Commission, Alabama 5,467
2335 (22) Counseling, Alabama Board 390
2336 of Examiners in
2337 (23) Court Reporting, Alabama 390
2338 Board of
2339 (24) Credit Union 4,295
2340 Administration
2341 (25) Crime Victims Compensation 8,981
2342 Commission, Alabama
2343 (26) Dietetics and Nutrition 1,952
2344 Practice, State Board of
2345 Examiners for
2346 (27) Early Childhood Education 109,729
2347 (28) Economic and Community 66,384
2348 Affairs, Department of
2349 (29) Education, Department of 356,522
Page 84

(29) Education, Department of 356,522
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2350 (30) Educational Television 16,401
2351 Commission
2352 (31) Electrical Contractors 1,562
2353 Board
2354 (32) Emergency Management 46,469
2355 Agency, Alabama
2356 (33) Engineers and Land 3,514
2357 Surveyors, State Board of
2358 Licensure of Professional
2359 (34) Environmental Management, 233,516
2360 Department of
2361 (35) Examiners of Public 84,738
2362 Accounts
2363 (36) Finance, Department of 156,198
2364 (37) Forensic Sciences, 89,814
2365 Department of
2366 (38) Foresters, Alabama State 390
2367 Board of Registration for
2368 (39) Forestry Commission, 98,795
2369 Alabama
2370 (40) Funeral Services, Alabama 3,124
2371 Board of
2372 (41) General Contractors, State 6,248
2373 Licensing Board for
2374 (42) Geological Survey 19,134
2375 (43) Governor's Mansion 1,562
2376 Authority
2377 (44) Governor's Office 18,744
Page 85

(44) Governor's Office 18,744
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2378 (45) Health Planning and 4,295
2379 Development Agency, State
2380 (46) Hearing Instrument Dealers 390
2381 (47) Heating, Air Conditioning 5,076
2382 and Refrigeration
2383 Contractors, Board of
2384 (48) Historical Commission, 27,725
2385 Alabama
2386 (49) Home Builders Licensure 9,372
2387 Board
2388 (50) Home Medical Equipment 390
2389 Services Provider Board
2390 (51) Human Resources, 1,595,564
2391 Department of
2392 (52) Indian Affairs Commission 1,171
2393 (53) Insurance, Department of 74,975
2394 (54) Judicial Inquiry 2,733
2395 Commission
2396 (55) Labor, Department of 237,421
2397 (56) Liquefied Petroleum Gas 3,124
2398 Board
2399 (57) Manufactured Housing 10,153
2400 Commission, Alabama
2401 (58) Massage Therapy, Alabama 781
2402 Board of
2403 (59) Medicaid Agency, Alabama 246,403
2404 (60) Medical Cannabis 2,733
2405 Commission
Page 86

2,733
Commission
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2406 (61) Mental Health, Department 530,293
2407 of
2408 (62) Military Department 100,748
2409 (63) Nursing Home 390
2410 Administrators, Board of
2411 Examiners of
2412 (64) Nursing, Alabama Board of 29,287
2413 (65) Occupational Therapy, 781
2414 Board of
2415 (66) Office of Information 46,078
2416 Technology
2417 (67) Oil and Gas Board 11,324
2418 (68) Onsite Wastewater Board 1,562
2419 (69) Pardons and Paroles, Board 316,301
2420 of
2421 (70) Peace Officers' Annuity 1,171
2422 and Benefit Fund, Alabama
2423 (71) Peace Officers' Standards 2,733
2424 and Training Commission,
2425 Alabama
2426 (72) Physical Fitness, 1,562
2427 Commission on
2428 (73) Physical Therapy, Board of 1,562
2429 (74) Plumbers and Gas Fitters 5,857
2430 Examining Board
2431 (75) Polygraph Examiners, Board 390
2432 of
2433 (76) Port Authority, Alabama 21,477
2434 State
Page 87

21,477
State
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2435 (77) Psychology, Alabama Board 781
2436 of Examiners in
2437 (78) Public Education 13,667
2438 Employees' Health Insurance
2439 Board (PEEHIP)
2440 (79) Public Health (Contract 245,000
2441 Team)
2442 (80) Public Library Service, 12,886
2443 Alabama
2444 (81) Public Service Commission 25,773
2445 (82) Real Estate Appraisers 2,343
2446 Board, Alabama
2447 (83) Real Estate Commission, 13,667
2448 Alabama
2449 (84) Rehabilitation Services, 313,177
2450 Department of
2451 (85) Retirement Systems 134,721
2452 (86) Revenue, Department of 479,919
2453 (87) Secretary of State 14,839
2454 (88) Securities Commission 28,506
2455 (89) Security Regulatory Board, 781
2456 Alabama
2457 (90) Senior Services, 24,211
2458 Department of
2459 (91) Social Work Examiners, 1,562
2460 Alabama State Board of
2461 (92) Speech Pathology and 390
2462 Audiology, Alabama Board of
2463 Examiners for
Page 88

390
Examiners for
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2464 (93) State Employees' Insurance 17,182
2465 Board
2466 (94) State Law Enforcement 540,836
2467 Agency
2468 (95) Surface Mining Commission, 8,591
2469 Alabama
2470 (96) Tax Tribunal, Alabama 2,343
2471 (97) Tourism Department, 26,554
2472 Alabama
2473 (98) Transportation, Alabama 1,676,024
2474 Department of
2475 (99) Transportation, Alabama 980,000
2476 Department of (Contract
2477 Team)
2478 (100) Treasurer, State 10,543
2479 (101) Veterans Affairs, 11,324
2480 Department of
2481 (102) Veterinary Medical 2,343
2482 Examiners, Alabama State
2483 Board of
2484 (103) Youth Services, 162,056
2485 Department of
2486 (104) Health, Department of 1,037,546
2487 Public
2488 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2489 (1) State Agency Collections 13,000,000
2490 Total Personnel Department, State 13,000,000 13,000,000
Page 89

Total Personnel Department, State 13,000,000 13,000,000
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2491 The above appropriations for the contract teams of the Department of Corrections and
2492 the Department of Public Health are for an estimated amount as agreed upon by the
2493 State Personnel Department and said departments for model work teams.
2494 98. Physical Therapy, Board of:
2495 (a) Professional and 858,335 858,335
2496 Occupational Licensing and
2497 Regulation Program
2498 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2499 (1) Physical Therapist Fund 858,335
2500 As provided in Section 34-24-195, Code of Alabama 1975.
2501 Total Physical Therapy, Board of 858,335 858,335
2502 99. Plumbers and Gas Fitters
2503 Examining Board:
2504 (a) Professional and 2,618,937 2,618,937
2505 Occupational Licensing and
2506 Regulation Program
2507 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2508 (1) Board of Plumbers and Gas 2,618,937
2509 Fitters Examiners Fund
2510 As provided in Section 34-37-5, Code of Alabama 1975.
2511 Total Plumbers and Gas Fitters 2,618,937 2,618,937
2512 Examining Board
2513 100. Podiatry Board, Alabama:
2514 (a) Professional and 120,000 120,000
2515 Occupational Licensing and
2516 Regulation Program
2517 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2518 (1) Podiatry Board 120,000
2519 Total Podiatry Board, Alabama 120,000 120,000
Page 90

Total Podiatry Board, Alabama 120,000 120,000
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2520 101. Polygraph Examiners, Board
2521 of:
2522 (a) Professional and 40,000 40,000
2523 Occupational Licensing and
2524 Regulation Program
2525 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2526 (1) Board of Polygraph Examiners 40,000
2527 Fund
2528 As provided in Section 34-25-5, Code of Alabama 1975.
2529 Total Polygraph Examiners, Board 40,000 40,000
2530 of
2531 102. Private Investigation Board,
2532 Alabama:
2533 (a) Professional and 242,000 242,000
2534 Occupational Licensing and
2535 Regulation Program
2536 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2537 (1) Private Investigation Board 242,000
2538 Fund
2539 As provided in Section 34-25B-7, Code of Alabama 1975.
2540 Total Private Investigation Board, 242,000 242,000
2541 Alabama
2542 103. Prosecution Services, Office
2543 of:
2544 (a) Prosecution, Training, 1,778,736 2,600,000 4,378,736
2545 Education and Management
2546 Program
2547 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2548 (1) State General Fund 1,778,736
Page 91

(1) State General Fund 1,778,736
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2549 (2) Office of Prosecution 2,000,000
2550 Services Fund
2551 (3) Victim Service Officer Funds 600,000
2552 Total Prosecution Services, Office 1,778,736 2,600,000 4,378,736
2553 of
2554 104. Prosthetists and Orthotists,
2555 Alabama State Board of:
2556 (a) Professional and 133,500 133,500
2557 Occupational Licensing and
2558 Regulation Program
2559 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2560 (1) State Board of Prosthetists 133,500
2561 and Orthotists Fund
2562 Total Prosthetists and Orthotists, 133,500 133,500
2563 Alabama State Board of
2564 In accordance with Sections 34-25A-1 through 34-25A-14, Code of Alabama 1975.
2565 105. Psychology, Alabama Board of
2566 Examiners in:
2567 (a) Professional and 619,862 619,862
2568 Occupational Licensing and
2569 Regulation Program
2570 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2571 (1) Board of Examiners in 619,862
2572 Psychology Fund
2573 As provided in Section 34-26-43, Code of Alabama 1975.
2574 Total Psychology, Alabama Board of 619,862 619,862
2575 Examiners in
2576 106. Public Service Commission:
2577 (a) Regulatory Services Program 22,607,121 22,607,121
Page 92

(a) Regulatory Services Program 22,607,121 22,607,121
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2578 Notwithstanding any other laws to the contrary, the above appropriation
2579 includes a transfer to the State General Fund of $6,000,000 to be made in four
2580 equal amounts at the end of each quarter of the fiscal year.
2581 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2582 (1) Gas Pipeline Safety Fund 2,299,866
2583 (2) Public Service Commission 13,006,255
2584 Fund
2585 The above appropriation to the Alabama Public Service Commission shall be
2586 payable only from inspection and supervision fees paid by utilities, radio
2587 companies, transportation companies, and such parts or percentages of fees and
2588 taxes paid by motor carrier or motor transportation companies as are now or
2589 may be set aside by law to be used by the Commission.
2590 (3) Public Service Commission 6,000,000
2591 Fund - Transfer to the State
2592 General Fund
2593 (4) State Dual Party Relay Fund 1,301,000
2594 In accordance with Section 37-1-80.2, Code of Alabama 1975.
2595 Total Public Service Commission 22,607,121 22,607,121
2596 The Public Service Commission shall, from the funds appropriated above, pay the
2597 state's annual membership fees to the Southern States Energy Board for the calendar
2598 year 2027.
2599 107. Real Estate Appraisers Board,
2600 Alabama:
2601 (a) Professional and 1,539,693 1,539,693
2602 Occupational Licensing and
2603 Regulation Program
2604 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2605 (1) Real Estate Appraisers Board 1,539,693
2606 Fund
2607 In accordance with Sections 34-27A-1 through 34-27A-29, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 93

In accordance with Sections 34-27A-1 through 34-27A-29, Code of Alabama 1975.
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2608 Total Real Estate Appraisers 1,539,693 1,539,693
2609 Board, Alabama
2610 108. Real Estate Commission,
2611 Alabama:
2612 (a) Professional and 5,860,533 5,860,533
2613 Occupational Licensing and
2614 Regulation Program
2615 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2616 (1) Alabama Real Estate 200,000
2617 Commission - Recovery Fund
2618 (2) Alabama Real Estate 5,660,533
2619 Commission Fund
2620 As provided in Section 34-27-4, Code of Alabama 1975.
2621 Total Real Estate Commission, 5,860,533 5,860,533
2622 Alabama
2623 109. Respiratory Therapy, Alabama
2624 State Board of:
2625 (a) Professional and 350,000 350,000
2626 Occupational Licensing and
2627 Regulation Program
2628 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2629 (1) Respiratory Therapy Board 350,000
2630 Fund
2631 As provided in Sections 34-27B-1 through 34-27B-14, Code of Alabama 1975.
2632 Total Respiratory Therapy, Alabama 350,000 350,000
2633 State Board of
2634 110. Revenue, Department of:
2635 (a) State Revenue Administration 463,000 229,166,353 229,629,353
2636 Program
Page 94

463,000 229,166,353 229,629,353
Program
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2637 Of the above appropriation to the Revenue Administration Program, the amount
2638 of $16,505,000 shall be transferred to the State General Fund in four equal
2639 payments at the beginning of each quarter of the fiscal year.
2640 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2641 (1) State General Fund - Board 113,000
2642 of Equalization
2643 (2) State General Fund - 350,000
2644 Transfer
2645 As provided in Section 40-7-70, Code of Alabama 1975, to maintain a program
2646 for the equalization of ad valorem assessments.
2647 (3) Contract Fees 528
2648 (4) Federal and Local Funds 24,224,671
2649 (5) Inspection fees for restored 1,537,577
2650 vehicles
2651 As provided in Section 32-8-87, Code of Alabama 1975.
2652 (6) Transfer from the gross 12,665,526
2653 proceeds of Gasoline Tax
2654 Collections
2655 (7) Transfer from the gross 381
2656 proceeds of Motor Carrier
2657 Mileage Tax Collections
2658 (8) Transfer from the gross 1,360,110
2659 proceeds of Motor Fuel Tax
2660 Collections
2661 (9) Transfer from the gross 330,712
2662 proceeds of Motor Vehicle
2663 License Collections
Page 95

330,712
License Collections
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2664 (10) Transfer from the gross 2,644,002
2665 proceeds of Motor Vehicle
2666 License Collections for the
2667 purchase only of Motor
2668 Vehicle License Tags,
2669 Estimated
2670 (11) Transfer from the gross 127,795,552
2671 proceeds of Sales Tax
2672 Collections
2673 (12) Transfer from the gross 6,733
2674 proceeds of the Aviation
2675 Fuel Tax Collections
2676 (13) Transfer from the gross 250,000
2677 proceeds of the Construction
2678 Industry Fee Collections
2679 As provided in Sections 41-10-727 through 41-10-732, Code of Alabama 1975.
2680 (14) Transfer from the gross 36,839
2681 proceeds of the Contractors'
2682 Gross Receipts Privilege Tax
2683 Collections
2684 (15) Transfer from the gross 247,409
2685 proceeds of the Diesel Tax -
2686 Rebuild Alabama, ACT 2019-2,
2687 Collections
2688 (16) Transfer from the gross 50,000
2689 proceeds of the Drycleaning
2690 Environmental Fee
2691 Collections
Page 96

50,000
Collections
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2692 (17) Transfer from the gross 37,000
2693 proceeds of the Electronic
2694 Nicotine Delivery Systems
2695 Tax Collections
2696 (18) Transfer from the gross 291,407
2697 proceeds of the Forest
2698 Severance Tax Collections
2699 (19) Transfer from the gross 744,926
2700 proceeds of the Gas Tax -
2701 Rebuild Alabama, ACT 2019-2,
2702 Collections
2703 (20) Transfer from the gross 91,471
2704 proceeds of the HB287 Tax
2705 Collections
2706 (21) Transfer from the gross 254
2707 proceeds of the
2708 Hydroelectric Privilege Tax
2709 Collections
2710 (22) Transfer from the gross 9,677
2711 proceeds of the IFTA Tax
2712 Collections
2713 (23) Transfer from the gross 12,957
2714 proceeds of the Lubricating
2715 Oil Excise Tax
2716 (24) Transfer from the gross 58,688
2717 proceeds of the Nursing
2718 Facility Privilege Tax
2719 Collections
Page 97

58,688
Collections
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2720 (25) Transfer from the gross 165,774
2721 proceeds of the
2722 Pharmaceutical Services
2723 Privilege Tax Collections
2724 (26) Transfer from the gross 60,000
2725 proceeds of the Scrap Tire
2726 Environmental Fee
2727 Collections
2728 As provided in Section 22-40A-14, Code of Alabama 1975.
2729 (27) Transfer from the gross 485,509
2730 proceeds of the Store
2731 License Tax Collections
2732 (28) Transfer from the gross 440,921
2733 proceeds of the Tobacco Tax
2734 Collections
2735 (29) Transfer from the gross 312,621
2736 proceeds of the Utility Tax
2737 Collections
2738 (30) Transfer from the gross 3,986,074
2739 proceeds of Use Tax
2740 Collections
2741 (31) Transfer from the Income 44,035,642
2742 Tax Collections
2743 (32) Transfer from the Pension 1,820,848
2744 Fund as part of the cost of
2745 collections of the 1-Mill Ad
2746 Valorem Tax
2747 (33) Transfer from the Public 5,462,544
2748 School Fund as part of the
2749 cost of collections of the
2750 3-Mill Ad Valorem Tax
Page 98

5,462,544
3-Mill Ad Valorem Tax
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2751 Total Revenue, Department of 463,000 229,166,353 229,629,353
2752 The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the cost of maintenance and operations of
2753 the Department of Revenue are in lieu of any other statutory provisions for the
2754 payment of the cost of operating said Department for collections of the taxes as
2755 authorized by law. Provided, however, in addition to the amount hereinabove
2756 appropriated, there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Revenue all sums
2757 allowed the Department of Revenue by acts of the Legislature as a charge for the
2758 collection of taxes or licenses. The Revenue Department shall not be limited in any
2759 way whatsoever in its ability to utilize or spend its full appropriation and all
2760 sums allowed to the Department of Revenue by acts of the Legislature as a charge for
2761 the collection of taxes or licenses. It is the intent of the Legislature that the
2762 Department of Revenue utilize the appropriations made to it in this act to: (1)
2763 significantly reduce the amount of delinquent taxes owed to the state; (2) employ
2764 sufficient examiners and audit personnel to ensure that taxes owed to the state are
2765 collected accurately and timely; and (3) update its personal computers and related
2766 equipment to become more efficient in the collection of taxes owed to the state.
2767 During Fiscal Year 2027, the Department shall report semi-annually to the Chairs of
2768 the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and Senate Finance and
2769 Taxation-General Fund Committee, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer on all actions
2770 taken by the Department in furtherance of these goals. The reports shall include,
2771 but not be limited to: (1) the number and amount of delinquent taxes collected
2772 during the quarter and the number and amounts of delinquent taxes outstanding as of
2773 the end of the quarter; (2) the number of additional examiners and audit personnel
2774 employed during the quarter (not including examiners and audit personnel employed to
2775 replace personnel that retire or otherwise leave state service); and (3) the number
2776 of new personal computers and related equipment put into use during the quarter.
2777 111. Secretary of State:
2778 (a) Administrative Support 12,386,000 12,386,000
2779 Services Program
2780 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2781 (1) Office of Voter Registration 200,000
Page 99

(1) Office of Voter Registration 200,000
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2782 In accordance with Section 17-4-62, Code of Alabama 1975.
2783 (2) Corporations Fund, Estimated 3,619,500
2784 (3) Electronic Voting Fund 6,000
2785 (4) Farmers Credit Protection 63,000
2786 Fund
2787 In accordance with Section 7-9A-320, Code of Alabama 1975.
2788 (5) Federal Funds 6,000,000
2789 (6) Information Bulk Sales Fund 1,650,000
2790 In accordance with Section 7-9A-523, Code of Alabama 1975.
2791 (7) Uniform Commercial Code Fund 847,500
2792 Total Secretary of State 12,386,000 12,386,000
2793 112. Securities Commission:
2794 (a) Regulatory Services Program 21,642,145 21,642,145
2795 Notwithstanding any other laws to the contrary, the above appropriation
2796 includes a transfer to the State General Fund of $3,500,000 to be made in four
2797 equal amounts at the beginning of each quarter of the fiscal year.
2798 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2799 (1) Securities Commission Fund 18,142,145
2800 (2) Securities Commission Fund - 3,500,000
2801 Transfer to the State
2802 General Fund
2803 Total Securities Commission 21,642,145 21,642,145
2804 113. Security Regulatory Board,
2805 Alabama:
2806 (a) Licensing, Regulation and 950,000 950,000
2807 Enforcement Program
2808 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2809 (1) Security Certification Fund 950,000
2810 Total Security Regulatory Board, 950,000 950,000
2811 Alabama
Page 100

950,000 950,000
Alabama
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2812 In accordance with Sections 34-27C-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
2813 114. Senior Services, Department
2814 of:
2815 (a) Planning and Advocacy for 17,475,096 44,010,123 61,485,219
2816 the Elderly Program
2817 (1) Adult Guardianships 150,000
2818 (2) Elderly Nutrition Program 500,000
2819 (3) Ombudsman Program 500,000
2820 (4) Retired Senior Volunteer 457,580
2821 Program
2822 (5) Silver Haired Legislature 25,000
2823 (6) Studio 60 Senior Center 100,000
2824 (b) Medicaid Waiver Services 31,400,584 200,399,368 231,799,952
2825 Program
2826 (c) Elderly Medication Program 1,758,636 1,758,636
2827 The Alabama SenioRx program shall provide assistance obtaining prescription
2828 medications and shall be expanded to allow comprehensive benefits screening
2829 and application assistance through an Area Agency on Aging designated by the
2830 Department as an Aging and Disability Resource Center (ADRC). It is the intent
2831 of the Legislature that applicants apply through local Area Agencies on Aging
2832 and their provider networks to ensure services are maximized and that
2833 paperwork and inconvenience to the clients are minimized to receive access to
2834 local and public benefits and prescription assistance. The Department of
2835 Senior Services shall report semi-annually to the Chairs of the House Ways and
2836 Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund
2837 Committee, the Governor, the Director of Finance, and the Legislative Fiscal
2838 Officer. The reports shall include the number of clients served by an ADRC,
2839 the number of unduplicated SenioRx participants, the number of prescriptions
2840 filled, and the estimated value of the drugs provided.
2841 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 101

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2842 (1) State General Fund 17,475,096
2843 (2) State General Fund - 31,400,584
2844 Medicaid Waiver
2845 (3) State General Fund - 1,758,636
2846 Transfer - Alabama SeniorRx
2847 (4) Federal and Local Funds 244,409,491
2848 Total Senior Services, Department 50,634,316 244,409,491 295,043,807
2849 of
2850 In addition to the appropriations hereinabove made, there is hereby appropriated
2851 such amounts as become available from the Senior Services Trust Fund in accordance
2852 with Section 41-15C-1, Code of Alabama 1975, to the Department of Senior Services
2853 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027.
2854 115. Social Work Examiners,
2855 Alabama State Board of:
2856 (a) Professional and 523,462 523,462
2857 Occupational Licensing and
2858 Regulation Program
2859 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2860 (1) Alabama State Board of 523,462
2861 Social Work Examiners Fund
2862 As provided in Section 34-30-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
2863 Total Social Work Examiners, 523,462 523,462
2864 Alabama State Board of
2865 116. Soil and Water Conservation
2866 Committee, State:
2867 (a) Water Resource Development 4,017,915 50,000,000 54,017,915
2868 Program
2869 (1) Feral Hog Program 200,000
Page 102

(1) Feral Hog Program 200,000
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2870 (2) Regional Conservation 81,403
2871 Partnership Program (RCPP)
2872 State Match
2873 (b) Professional and 6,000 6,000
2874 Occupational Licensing and
2875 Regulation Program
2876 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2877 (1) State General Fund 4,017,915
2878 (2) Departmental Receipts 50,000,000
2879 (3) Soil Classifiers Fund 6,000
2880 As provided in Section 34-32-19, Code of Alabama 1975.
2881 Total Soil and Water Conservation 4,017,915 50,006,000 54,023,915
2882 Committee, State
2883 117. Speech Pathology and
2884 Audiology, Alabama Board of
2885 Examiners for:
2886 (a) Professional and 342,000 342,000
2887 Occupational Licensing and
2888 Regulation Program
2889 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2890 (1) Alabama Board of Examiners 342,000
2891 for Speech Pathology and
2892 Audiology Fund
2893 As provided in Section 34-28A-44, Code of Alabama 1975.
2894 Total Speech Pathology and 342,000 342,000
2895 Audiology, Alabama Board of
2896 Examiners for
2897 118. Surface Mining Commission,
2898 Alabama:
Page 103

Alabama:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2899 (a) Industrial Safety and 1,018,860 10,493,863 11,512,723
2900 Accident Prevention Program
2901 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2902 (1) State General Fund - 1,018,860
2903 Transfer
2904 (2) Bond Forfeiture/Reclamation 7,000,000
2905 Projects, Estimated
2906 As provided in Section 9-16-103, Code of Alabama 1975.
2907 (3) Federal and Local Funds 2,060,638
2908 (4) Surface Mining Commission - 1,433,225
2909 Fees
2910 Total Surface Mining Commission, 1,018,860 10,493,863 11,512,723
2911 Alabama
2912 119. Tax Tribunal, Alabama:
2913 (a) Administrative Services 1,169,479 1,169,479
2914 Program
2915 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2916 (1) Alabama Tax Tribunal Fund 1,169,479
2917 Total Tax Tribunal, Alabama 1,169,479 1,169,479
2918 120. Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway
2919 Development Authority:
2920 (a) Water Resource Development 150,000 150,000
2921 Program
2922 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2923 (1) State General Fund 150,000
2924 Total Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway 150,000 150,000
2925 Development Authority
2926 121. Tourism Department, Alabama:
2927 (a) Tourism and Travel Promotion 9,936,889 31,740,450 41,677,339
2928 Program
Page 104

9,936,889 31,740,450 41,677,339
Program
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2929 (1) Alabama Bass Trail 324,437
2930 (2) Alabama Scenic River Trail 600,000
2931 (3) Alabama Sports Festival 575,000
2932 (4) Athens Limestone Tourism 100,000
2933 (5) Bear Creek Development 150,000
2934 Authority
2935 (6) Birmingham Civil Rights 200,000
2936 Museum
2937 (7) Birmingham Negro Baseball 100,000
2938 Museum
2939 (8) Blackbelt Adventures 875,000
2940 (9) Buckmasters 300,000
2941 (10) Cullman Tourism Board 200,000
2942 (11) Dothan Area Botanical 175,000 50,000
2943 Gardens
2944 (12) Freshwater Land Trust 325,000
2945 a. Village Creek Greenway to 25,000
2946 secure matching funds
2947 (13) Geneva River Festival 100,000
2948 (14) Honda Battle of the Bands 200,000
2949 (15) Hope Outdoors 50,000
2950 (16) Indy Grand Prix of Alabama 500,000 500,000
2951 (17) Jazz Hall of Fame 100,000
2952 (18) Jefferson County Greenways 250,000
2953 Commission
2954 (19) Local and State Economy 3,000,000
2955 Tourism Grants
2956 (20) Magic City Classic 350,000
Page 105

(20) Magic City Classic 350,000
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2957 (21) Major League Fishing 150,000
2958 Anglers Association
2959 National Headquarters
2960 (22) Mobile Sports Authority 400,000
2961 (23) Motor Sports Hall of Fame 250,000
2962 (24) Music and Concert Festival 500,000
2963 Promotion
2964 To be used to provide grants to support concerts and music festivals
2965 throughout the state that promote tourism and the State of Alabama. The
2966 maximum grant amount shall by $100,000. It is the intent of the Legislature
2967 that all funds appropriated for this program be awarded in fiscal year 2027.
2968 Any unexpended funds shall revert to the General Fund. The Department of
2969 Tourism shall report quarterly to the Chairmen of the House and Senate
2970 Economic Development and Tourism Committees regarding the amount and
2971 location of grants awarded.
2972 (25) Nature Discovery Center 100,000
2973 Project
2974 (26) Regions Tradition Golf 100,000
2975 Tournament
2976 (27) Singing River Trail 300,000
2977 (28) Talladega Superspeedway 500,000
2978 For security expenses.
2979 (29) Talladega Superspeedway 500,000
2980 For tourism generally.
2981 (30) USS Alabama Battleship 750,000
2982 (31) SEC Baseball Tournament 75,000
2983 (32) SWAC Championship Series 400,000
2984 (33) SEC Softball 75,000
2985 Huntsville-Madison
Page 106

75,000
Huntsville-Madison
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2986 (34) Yellowhammer Outdoors 200,000
2987 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2988 (1) State General Fund 9,936,889
2989 (2) Lodging Tax ($0.01) 31,740,450
2990 Receipts collected under the provisions of Sections 40-26-1, et seq., Code of
2991 Alabama 1975.
2992 Total Tourism Department, Alabama 9,936,889 31,740,450 41,677,339
2993 122. Transportation, Department
2994 of:
2995 (a) Surface Transportation 1,620,856,019 1,620,856,019
2996 Improvement and Preservation
2997 Program
2998 Proposed spending plan for the above (a) includes the following: Industrial
2999 Access Improvements & Assistance: $11,000,000
3000 (b) General Administration 188,201,823 188,201,823
3001 Program
3002 Proposed spending plan for the above (b) includes the following: Captive
3003 County Health Insurance: $75,000
3004 (c) General Aviation and 70,000,000 70,000,000
3005 Aeronautic Improvement and
3006 Assistance Program
3007 (d) Rebuild Alabama Program 683,000,000 683,000,000
3008 (e) Electronic Transportation 1,200,000 1,200,000
3009 Infrastructure Grant Program
3010 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3011 (1) Federal Aid 1,254,057,842
3012 (2) Public Road and Bridge Fund 555,000,000
Page 107

(2) Public Road and Bridge Fund 555,000,000
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3013 There is hereby appropriated for payment of the principal of and the interest
3014 on all bonds heretofore or hereafter issued for public highways and bridge
3015 purposes, or either, by the State of Alabama, Alabama Federal Aid Highway
3016 Finance Authority, Alabama Highway Finance Corporation, Alabama Industrial
3017 Access Road and Bridge Corporation, or Alabama Highway Authority a total of
3018 $192,993,061 or so much thereof as may be necessary for payment of said
3019 principal and interest at their respective maturities, of the revenues pledged
3020 for such payment. There is also hereby appropriated an amount not to exceed
3021 $25,000,000 as an annual contribution to the Alabama Transportation
3022 Infrastructure Bank, if needed, for payment of debt service. The Director of
3023 Transportation, with the consent of the Governor and the Director of Finance,
3024 shall have the authority to transfer any appropriation or any portion thereof
3025 between and among subdivisions (a), (b) and (c) of this section whenever such
3026 transfer shall be necessary to assure maximum utilization of federal matching
3027 funds which shall become available. In the event that there shall not be
3028 sufficient funds available for payment of all appropriations hereinabove made,
3029 the following provisions shall be applicable. In the event of such
3030 insufficiency in respect of said revenues accruing to the Department of
3031 Transportation: (1) the appropriation made for Debt Service in subdivisions
3032 (a) and (b) hereof shall be paid in full, and (2) the appropriations from the
3033 revenues accruing to the Department of Transportation that are herein made for
3034 the purposes referred to in subdivisions (a), (b) and (c) except for Debt
3035 Service, hereof shall be allocated among the purposes referred to in said
3036 subdivisions in such order and with such priorities as the Director of the
3037 Department of Transportation shall from time to time direct. The funds
3038 appropriated in subdivisions (a) and (c) hereof, for the matching federal
3039 funds, shall not revert at the end of the fiscal year for which such
3040 appropriations are made but shall remain available for the purposes for which
3041 such appropriations were made. In addition to all appropriations hereinabove
3042 made, there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Transportation all
3043 federal funds accruing thereto to be expended only for the purpose for which
3044 such funds are made available.
Page 108

such funds are made available.
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3045 (3) Federal Grants - Aeronautics 70,000,000
3046 (4) Rebuild Alabama Fund 684,200,000
3047 Total Transportation, Department 2,563,257,842 2,563,257,842
3048 of
3049 In addition to the above appropriation, there is hereby appropriated to the
3050 Department of Transportation such amounts as may be received by the Department for
3051 resolution of Civil Action No. 85-T-655-N.
3052 123. Treasurer, State:
3053 (a) Fiscal Management Program 6,440,062 6,440,062
3054 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3055 (1) Alabama College Education 443,257
3056 Savings Administrative Fund
3057 As provided in Section 16-33C-10, Code of Alabama 1975.
3058 (2) Prepaid Affordable College 478,201
3059 Tuition Fund
3060 (3) Safe Program Enforcement 2,500
3061 Fund
3062 (4) State Treasury Operations 5,516,104
3063 Fund
3064 As provided in Section 36-17-20, Code of Alabama 1975.
3065 Total Treasurer, State 6,440,062 6,440,062
3066 124. Underground and Aboveground
3067 Storage Tank Trust Fund
3068 Management Board, Alabama:
3069 (a) Administration of 150,000 150,000
3070 Underground and Aboveground
3071 Storage Tank Trust Fund
3072 Management Board Program
3073 (1) Continuing Education and 150,000
3074 Training Program
Page 109

150,000
Training Program
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3075 This amount may be used for a continuing education and training program
3076 related to storage tank release prevention and clean up. Such continuing
3077 education shall be provided by a qualified program approved by the
3078 Underground and Aboveground Storage Tank Trust Fund Management Board.
3079 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3080 (1) Underground and Aboveground 150,000
3081 Storage Tank Trust Fund
3082 As provided in Section 22-35-4, Code of Alabama 1975.
3083 Total Underground and Aboveground 150,000 150,000
3084 Storage Tank Trust Fund Management
3085 Board, Alabama
3086 125. Underground Damage Prevention
3087 Authority:
3088 (a) Underground Damage 101,946 101,946
3089 Prevention Authority Program
3090 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3091 (1) Underground Damage 101,946
3092 Prevention Authority Fund
3093 Total Underground Damage 101,946 101,946
3094 Prevention Authority
3095 126. Veterans Affairs, Department
3096 of:
3097 (a) Administration of Veterans 4,339,157 11,628,009 15,967,166
3098 Affairs Program
3099 (1) Department of Alabama 113,400
3100 Disabled American Veterans
3101 a. Women's Auxiliary 5,000
3102 (2) Lakeshore Foundation 650,000
3103 Support Our Veterans
3104 Program
Page 110

650,000
Program
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3105 (3) Still Serving Veterans 70,000
3106 (4) Suicide Prevention 300,000
3107 To support efforts to prevent suicide among service members, veterans, and
3108 their families.
3109 (5) U.S. Veterans Memorial 400,000
3110 Foundation
3111 (b) Veterans Homes 164,276,050 164,276,050
3112 Administration Program
3113 (c) Capital Outlay Program 9,987,580 9,987,580
3114 (d) Veterans Cemetery Program 1,247,568 1,247,568
3115 (e) Veterans Grant Program 7,000,000 7,000,000
3116 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3117 (1) State General Fund 4,339,157
3118 (2) Veterans' Assistance Fund 101,742,780
3119 The appropriation from the Veterans' Assistance Fund may be expended for
3120 operation of the Veterans' Nursing Homes, any other direct expenditure for
3121 veterans' services, and capital outlay.
3122 (3) Veterans' Home Trust Fund - 92,396,427
3123 Transfer
3124 Total Veterans Affairs, Department 4,339,157 194,139,207 198,478,364
3125 of
3126 127. Veterinary Medical Examiners,
3127 Alabama State Board of:
3128 (a) Professional and 786,989 786,989
3129 Occupational Licensing and
3130 Regulation Program
3131 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3132 (1) State Board of Veterinary 786,989
3133 Medical Examiners Fund
3134 As provided in Section 34-29-70, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 111

As provided in Section 34-29-70, Code of Alabama 1975.
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3135 Total Veterinary Medical 786,989 786,989
3136 Examiners, Alabama State Board of
3137 128. Women's Commission, Alabama:
3138 (a) Employment and Social 35,000 35,000
3139 Opportunities Program
3140 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3141 (1) Women's Commission Fund 35,000
3142 Total Women's Commission, Alabama 35,000 35,000
3143 129. Workforce, Alabama Department
3144 of :
3145 (a) Regulatory Services Program 3,165,168 3,165,168
3146 (b) Administrative Services 350,000 26,621,770 26,971,770
3147 Program
3148 (1) Statewide Transportation 200,000
3149 Needs Assessment
3150 (c) Employment Security Program 66,214,349 66,214,349
3151 (d) Industrial Safety and 1,256,298 51,176,791 52,433,089
3152 Accident Prevention Program
3153 (1) Mine Safety Inspection 350,000
3154 Program
3155 (e) Regulation Workers' 6,752,993 6,752,993
3156 Compensation Program
3157 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3158 (1) State General Fund 1,606,298
3159 (2) Boiler and Pressure Vessel 1,454,259
3160 Inspection Fee Receipts
3161 As provided in Section 25-12-18, Code of Alabama 1975.
3162 (3) Child Labor Fund 169,553
3163 (4) Elevator Safety Review Fee 1,957,338
3164 Receipts
Page 112

1,957,338
Receipts
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3165 As provided in Section 25-13-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
3166 (5) Employment Security 6,817,156
3167 Administration Fund
3168 (6) Federal and Local Funds 85,832,981
3169 (7) Federal Funds: Abandoned 26,352,761
3170 Mine Land
3171 (8) Federal Funds: Abandoned 21,000,000
3172 Mine Land - BILF
3173 (9) State Abandoned Mine Land 3,594,030
3174 Reclamation Fund
3175 (10) Professional Employer 396,110
3176 Organization Registration
3177 Fund
3178 (11) Workers Compensation 6,356,883
3179 Administration Trust Fund
3180 Total Workforce, Alabama 1,606,298 153,931,071 155,537,369
3181 Department of
3182 130. Youth Services, Department
3183 of:
3184 (a) Financial Assistance Program 716,795 716,795
3185 (School District)
3186 (b) Youth Services Program 7,375,805 31,717,887 39,093,692
3187 (1) Juvenile Corrections 300,000
3188 (c) Diversion Program 1,000,000 1,000,000
3189 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3190 (1) State General Fund - 8,375,805
3191 Transfer
3192 (2) Youth Services Fund 32,434,682
3193 Total Youth Services, Department 8,375,805 32,434,682 40,810,487
3194 of
Page 113

8,375,805 32,434,682 40,810,487
of
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3195 It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department notify the members of each
3196 local legislative delegation (whenever possible) prior to grants being awarded in
3197 each legislative district. The Department shall notify the legislative delegation of
3198 the amount of the grant, the recipient of the grant, and the date the grant is to be
3199 awarded. Any appropriation expended for youth detention facilities shall be
3200 allocated as follows: Part I - each detention facility will receive $14,000 for each
3201 county the detention facility serves. Part II - the balance of such funds shall be
3202 allocated based upon the population of the county or counties served by the
3203 detention facility (statewide among 12 detention facilities).
3204 D. Other:
3205 1. Arrest of Absconding Felons:
3206 (a) Criminal Investigation 24,735 24,735
3207 Program, Estimated
3208 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3209 (1) State General Fund 24,735
3210 As provided in Sections 15-9-1 and 15-9-3, Code of Alabama 1975.
3211 Total Arrest of Absconding Felons 24,735 24,735
3212 2. Automatic Appeal Expense:
3213 (a) Legal Advice and Legal 33 33
3214 Services Program, Estimated
3215 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3216 (1) State General Fund 33
3217 As provided in Sections 12-22-150 and 12-22-241, Code of Alabama 1975.
3218 Total Automatic Appeal Expense 33 33
3219 3. County Government Capital
3220 Improvement Fund:
3221 (a) Special Services Program, 28,842,093 28,842,093
3222 Estimated
3223 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 114

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3224 (1) Alabama Trust Fund Income, 28,842,093
3225 Estimated
3226 Total County Government Capital 28,842,093 28,842,093
3227 Improvement Fund
3228 4. Court Assessed Costs Not
3229 Provided For:
3230 (a) Special Services Program, 5,500,000 5,500,000
3231 Estimated
3232 As provided in Sections 22-52-14, 22-11A-1 through 22-11A-41, 12-15-215,
3233 26-17-636 and 12-21-131, Code of Alabama 1975.
3234 (b) Legal Advice and Legal 264,500 264,500
3235 Services Program
3236 It is the intent of the Legislature that the appropriation in this subsection
3237 be expended for court costs, which include cost of depositions, witness fees
3238 and expenses, filing and docket fees, court reporters, court judgments,
3239 attorneys fees, out-of-court settlements, and other expenses ordered by the
3240 court or normally identified as costs of court, when any of the above is
3241 approved by the Attorney General. The Attorney General shall provide a report
3242 semi-annually to the Chair of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee,
3243 the Chair of the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee, and the
3244 Legislative Fiscal Officer on the detailed expenditures of this appropriation.
3245 (c) Automatic Appeal Cases 15,630 15,630
3246 Expense Program
3247 The above appropriation shall be used to reimburse reasonable expenses
3248 incurred by attorneys representing defendants under sentence of death in state
3249 collateral proceedings, such as those under Rule 32 of the Rules of Criminal
3250 Procedure. Provided, in no case may any amount be paid unless the court
3251 determines by written order in advance that the cost is both necessary and
3252 reasonable; and in no event may any amount be paid out of this appropriation
3253 as fees to any attorney for services or to compensate any attorney for time
3254 either as an attorney in the proceeding or as a witness.
Page 115

either as an attorney in the proceeding or as a witness.
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3255 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3256 (1) State General Fund 264,500
3257 (2) State General Fund, 5,500,000
3258 Estimated
3259 (3) State General Fund - 15,630
3260 Automatic Appeal Cases
3261 Total Court Assessed Costs Not 5,780,130 5,780,130
3262 Provided For
3263 5. Court Costs:
3264 (a) Court Operations Program, 81 81
3265 Estimated
3266 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3267 (1) State General Fund 81
3268 Pursuant to Act No. 558, 1957, Page 777.
3269 Total Court Costs 81 81
3270 6. Distribution of Public
3271 Documents:
3272 (a) Administrative Support 483,000 483,000
3273 Services Program, Estimated
3274 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3275 (1) State General Fund 483,000
3276 As provided in Sections 36-14-1, 36-14-11, 17-5-11, and 41-21-8, Code of
3277 Alabama 1975.
3278 Total Distribution of Public 483,000 483,000
3279 Documents
3280 7. Election Expenses:
3281 (a) Special Services Program, 9,476,500 9,476,500
3282 Estimated
3283 (b) Training of Election 32,849 32,849
3284 Officials
Page 116

32,849 32,849
Officials
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3285 For payment of expenses pursuant to the court order entered by the U.S.
3286 District Court, Middle District of Alabama in Civil Action No. 84-T-595-N.
3287 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3288 (1) State General Fund 32,849
3289 (2) State General Fund, 9,476,500
3290 Estimated
3291 Total Election Expenses 9,509,349 9,509,349
3292 As provided in Section 17-16-7, Code of Alabama 1975.
3293 8. Emergency Fund, Departmental:
3294 (a) Special Services Program 6,807,038 6,807,038
3295 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3296 (1) State General Fund 6,807,038
3297 Total Emergency Fund, Departmental 6,807,038 6,807,038
3298 This is the appropriation contemplated in Section 41-4-94, Code of Alabama 1975, and
3299 shall be the only amount appropriated and the total amount expended under the
3300 provisions of said section. This appropriation shall be expended solely for the
3301 purpose of addressing a financial emergency within a state department, board,
3302 commission, bureau, office, or agency. At least ten days prior to the release of any
3303 of this appropriation to any state department, board, commission, bureau, office, or
3304 agency, the Director of Finance shall notify the Chair of the Senate Finance and
3305 Taxation-General Fund Committee, the Chair of the House Ways and Means-General Fund
3306 Committee, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer of such pending transfer.
3307 9. Emergency Prisoner Feeding
3308 Fund:
3309 (a) Institutional Services - 750,000 750,000
3310 Corrections Program,
3311 Estimated
3312 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3313 (1) State General Fund - 750,000
3314 Transfer
Page 117

750,000
Transfer
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3315 Total Emergency Prisoner Feeding 750,000 750,000
3316 Fund
3317 10. Fair Trial Tax Transfer:
3318 (a) Court Operations Program, 85,692,909 85,692,909
3319 Estimated
3320 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3321 (1) State General Fund - 85,692,909
3322 Transfer
3323 Total Fair Trial Tax Transfer 85,692,909 85,692,909
3324 11. Feeding of Prisoners:
3325 (a) Institutional Services - 15,300,000 15,300,000
3326 Corrections Program,
3327 Estimated
3328 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3329 (1) State General Fund 15,300,000
3330 For expenses of feeding prisoners in county jails in accordance with Sections
3331 14-6-42 and 14-6-47, Code of Alabama 1975.
3332 Total Feeding of Prisoners 15,300,000 15,300,000
3333 12. Finance - CMIA, Department of:
3334 (a) Fiscal Management Program, 120,000 120,000
3335 Estimated
3336 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3337 (1) State General Fund 120,000
3338 As provided in Section 41-4-38, Code of Alabama 1975.
3339 Total Finance - CMIA, Department 120,000 120,000
3340 of
3341 13. Finance - FEMA, Department of:
3342 (a) Readiness and Recovery 5,760,099 5,760,099
3343 Program, Estimated
Page 118

5,760,099 5,760,099
Program, Estimated
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3344 For payment of the State's share of administrative costs and matching grants
3345 furnished by the Federal Emergency Management Agency.
3346 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3347 (1) State General Fund 5,760,099
3348 Total Finance - FEMA, Department 5,760,099 5,760,099
3349 of
3350 The above appropriation to the Department of Finance - FEMA from the State General
3351 Fund is conditioned upon the declaration of a man-made, technological, biological,
3352 or natural disaster area by the President of the United States and conditioned
3353 further upon the requirement by the Federal Emergency Management Agency for the
3354 State of Alabama to pay a state match for FEMA grants.
3355 14. Finance - Special Funds :
3356 (a) Financial Assistance Program 34,000,000 34,000,000
3357 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3358 (1) ARPA - State Small Business 34,000,000
3359 Credit Initiative Fund,
3360 Estimated
3361 Total Finance - Special Funds 34,000,000 34,000,000
3362 15. Forest Fire Fund, Emergency:
3363 (a) Forest Resources Protection 250,000 250,000
3364 and Development Program
3365 The appropriation to the Emergency Forest Fire Fund shall be conditioned as
3366 provided in Section 9-3-10.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
3367 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3368 (1) State General Fund - 250,000
3369 Transfer
3370 The appropriation to the Emergency Forest Fire Fund shall be conditioned as
3371 provided by Section 9-3-10.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
3372 Total Forest Fire Fund, Emergency 250,000 250,000
Page 119

Total Forest Fire Fund, Emergency 250,000 250,000
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3373 16. Governor's Conference,
3374 National:
3375 (a) Executive Direction Program, 156,624 156,624
3376 Estimated
3377 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3378 (1) State General Fund 156,624
3379 Total Governor's Conference, 156,624 156,624
3380 National
3381 17. Governor's Proclamation
3382 Expenses:
3383 (a) Executive Direction Program, 236,250 236,250
3384 Estimated
3385 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3386 (1) State General Fund 236,250
3387 As provided in Sections 17-12-18 and 17-14-53, Code of Alabama 1975.
3388 Total Governor's Proclamation 236,250 236,250
3389 Expenses
3390 18. Governor's Widow Retirement:
3391 (a) Executive Direction Program, 6,048 6,048
3392 Estimated
3393 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3394 (1) State General Fund 6,048
3395 As provided in Section 36-13-12, Code of Alabama 1975.
3396 Total Governor's Widow Retirement 6,048 6,048
3397 19. Law Enforcement Agency,
3398 Alabama-Emergency Code:
3399 (a) Readiness and Recovery 56,700 56,700
3400 Program
3401 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 120

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3402 (1) State General Fund - 56,700
3403 Transfer
3404 Total Law Enforcement Agency, 56,700 56,700
3405 Alabama-Emergency Code
3406 20. Law Enforcement Agency,
3407 Alabama-State Bureau of
3408 Investigation Cost of Evidence
3409 Fund:
3410 (a) Special Services Program 118,125 118,125
3411 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3412 (1) State General Fund - 118,125
3413 Transfer
3414 Total Law Enforcement Agency, 118,125 118,125
3415 Alabama-State Bureau of
3416 Investigation Cost of Evidence
3417 Fund
3418 The above appropriation to the Alabama Law Enforcement Agency SBI Cost of Evidence
3419 Fund shall be conditioned as provided in Section 32-2-11, Code of Alabama 1975, and
3420 shall remain in the State General Fund until a demonstrated need is determined and
3421 recommended by the Director of Finance and approved by the Governor.
3422 21. Law Enforcement Fund:
3423 (a) Criminal Investigation 10,000 10,000
3424 Program, Estimated
3425 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3426 (1) State General Fund 10,000
3427 Total Law Enforcement Fund 10,000 10,000
3428 22. Law Enforcement Legal Defense:
3429 (a) Legal Advice and Legal 819 819
3430 Services Program, Estimated
3431 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 121

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3432 (1) State General Fund 819
3433 To carry out provisions of Section 36-21-1, Code of Alabama 1975.
3434 Total Law Enforcement Legal 819 819
3435 Defense
3436 23. Military - Emergency Active
3437 Duty Pay:
3438 (a) Military Operations Program, 1,394,000 1,394,000
3439 Estimated
3440 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3441 (1) State General Fund 1,394,000
3442 As provided in Section 31-2-133, Code of Alabama 1975.
3443 Total Military - Emergency Active 1,394,000 1,394,000
3444 Duty Pay
3445 24. Municipal Government Capital
3446 Improvement Fund:
3447 (a) Special Services Program, 28,842,093 28,842,093
3448 Estimated
3449 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3450 (1) Alabama Trust Fund Income, 28,842,093
3451 Estimated
3452 Total Municipal Government Capital 28,842,093 28,842,093
3453 Improvement Fund
3454 25. Port Authority Transfer,
3455 Alabama :
3456 (a) State Port Authority Program 3,500,000 3,500,000
3457 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3458 (1) State General Fund 3,500,000
Page 122

(1) State General Fund 3,500,000
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3459 The above appropriation to the Alabama State Port Authority shall be
3460 conditioned upon the availability of funds and shall remain in the State
3461 General Fund until a demonstrated need is determined and recommended by the
3462 Director of Finance and approved by the Governor.
3463 Total Port Authority Transfer, 3,500,000 3,500,000
3464 Alabama
3465 26. Printing of Codes and
3466 Supplements - Secretary of
3467 State:
3468 (a) Administrative Support 250,000 250,000
3469 Services Program, Estimated
3470 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3471 (1) State General Fund 250,000
3472 As provided in Sections 41-21-1 through 41-21-8, Code of Alabama 1975.
3473 Total Printing of Codes and 250,000 250,000
3474 Supplements - Secretary of State
3475 It is the intent of the Legislature that the number of Codes and Supplements printed
3476 and distributed shall be limited to the minimum number actually needed, utilized,
3477 and required by law. Procedures should be adopted to verify the need and utility of
3478 required printed sets to ensure printing cost savings when possible.
3479 27. Printing of Legislative Acts
3480 and Journals:
3481 (a) Administrative Support 50,000 50,000
3482 Services Program, Estimated
3483 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3484 (1) State General Fund 50,000
3485 Total Printing of Legislative Acts 50,000 50,000
3486 and Journals
3487 28. Registration of Voters - Photo
3488 Voter Identification:
Page 123

Voter Identification:
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3489 (a) Special Services Program, 304,000 304,000
3490 Estimated
3491 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3492 (1) State General Fund 304,000
3493 In accordance with Section 17-9-30, Code of Alabama 1975.
3494 Total Registration of Voters - 304,000 304,000
3495 Photo Voter Identification
3496 All expenses from the above appropriation shall be reported by the Secretary of
3497 State to the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the
3498 Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee at least semi-annually for fiscal
3499 year 2027.
3500 29. Registration of Voters - Voter
3501 Registrars:
3502 (a) Special Services Program, 4,680,000 4,680,000
3503 Estimated
3504 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3505 (1) State General Fund 4,680,000
3506 In accordance with Sections 17-3-5 and 17-3-57, Code of Alabama 1975.
3507 Total Registration of Voters - 4,680,000 4,680,000
3508 Voter Registrars
3509 30. Removal of Prisoners:
3510 (a) Administrative Services and 1,100,000 1,100,000
3511 Logistical Support Program,
3512 Estimated
3513 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3514 (1) State General Fund 1,100,000
3515 As provided in Sections 15-10-70 through 15-10-73, 15-9-62, 15-9-65, and
3516 15-9-81, Code of Alabama 1975.
3517 Total Removal of Prisoners 1,100,000 1,100,000
Page 124

Total Removal of Prisoners 1,100,000 1,100,000
SB146 Enrolled
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3518 31. Sheriff's Advancement in
3519 Education, Technology, and
3520 Training Fund:
3521 (a) Special Services Program 5,000,000 5,000,000
3522 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3523 (1) State General Fund - 5,000,000
3524 Transfer
3525 Total Sheriff's Advancement in 5,000,000 5,000,000
3526 Education, Technology, and
3527 Training Fund
3528 32. Grimes, Don:
3529 (a) Special Services Program 50,000 50,000
3530 To pay the award by the Committee on Compensation for Wrongful Incarceration
3531 for the wrongful incarceration of Don Grimes.
3532 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3533 (1) State General Fund 50,000
3534 Total Grimes, Don 50,000 50,000
3535 33. Dandridge, Beniah:
3536 (a) Special Services Program 50,000 50,000
3537 To pay the award by the Committee on Compensation for Wrongful Incarceration
3538 for the wrongful incarceration of Beniah Dandridge.
3539 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3540 (1) State General Fund 50,000
3541 Total Dandridge, Beniah 50,000 50,000
3542
Page 125

SB146 Enrolled
3543
3544 Section 4. In addition to the amounts otherwise
3545 appropriated in this act, there is hereby appropriated from
3546 the several funds in the State Treasury, except the Education
3547 Trust Fund, and in the same proportion as the salaries of the
3548 several State officials and employees are paid, such
3549 additional amounts as may be necessary to pay for a two
3550 percent (2%) salary increase enacted in the 2026 Regular
3551 Session. The additional amounts appropriated in this section
3552 from the State General Fund shall not exceed $16,000,000 for
3553 the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. The Director of
3554 Finance shall ensure that first priority shall be given to all
3555 State General Fund payrolls, including the payroll of the
3556 Legislature. State agencies shall receive additional
3557 allocations from the appropriation made in this section from
3558 the State General Fund in amounts necessary to increase total
3559 salaries paid from the State General Fund by two percent. The
3560 remainder of this appropriation from the State General Fund
3561 may be allotted by the Director of Finance to those agencies
3562 which receive transfers from the State General Fund.
3563 Section 5. (a) The State General Fund appropriations
3564 in this act anticipate a beginning balance in the State
3565 General Fund for fiscal year 2027, excluding reversions and
3566 adjustments, of $300,120,715. If the State General Fund
3567 beginning balance for Fiscal Year 2027, excluding reversions
3568 and adjustments, is greater than the above stated anticipated
3569 amount, then the first $2,400,000 of the unanticipated and
Page 126

amount, then the first $2,400,000 of the unanticipated and
SB146 Enrolled
3570 unappropriated beginning balance is hereby appropriated from
3571 the State General Fund to state agencies to pay for a one-time
3572 bonus for certain retirees of the Employees' Retirement
3573 System. The Director of Finance shall ensure that first
3574 priority shall be given to all State General Fund payrolls,
3575 including the payroll of the Legislature. State Agencies may
3576 receive additional allocations from the appropriation made in
3577 this section from the State General Fund in amounts necessary
3578 to grant the bonus from the State General Fund. The remainder
3579 of this appropriation from the State General Fund may be
3580 allotted by the Director of Finance to those agencies which
3581 receive transfers from the State General Fund. In addition to
3582 these funds appropriated from the State General Fund, there is
3583 hereby appropriated from the several funds in the State
3584 Treasury, except the Education Trust Fund, and in the same
3585 proportion as the salaries of the several State Officials and
3586 employees are paid, such additional amounts as may be
3587 necessary to pay for the one-time bonus. The funds
3588 appropriated for the bonus in this section are conditioned
3589 upon the enactment of SB_ or HB_ during the 2026 Regular
3590 Session authorizing such bonus.
3591 (b) The remaining amount of the unanticipated and
3592 unappropriated beginning balance, not to exceed at total of
3593 $30,000,000 is hereby appropriated from the State General
3594 Fund to the following funds: (1) State General Fund Budget
3595 Reserve Fund established in Chapter 13 of Title 29, Code of
3596 Alabama 1975, $15,000,000; and (2) Medicaid Emergency Reserve
Page 127

Alabama 1975, $15,000,000; and (2) Medicaid Emergency Reserve
SB146 Enrolled
3597 Fund established in Article 12, Chapter 6 of Title 22, Code of
3598 Alabama 1975, $15,000,000.
3599 Section 6. Notwithstanding any other provisions of
3600 this act or any other act, any amounts from appropriations for
3601 the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, to the various
3602 state agencies in this act which were unexpended and reverted
3603 on September 30, 2026, are hereby reappropriated to the
3604 respective offices for the fiscal year beginning October 1,
3605 2026.
3606 Section 7. In addition to all other appropriations
3607 heretofore or hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
3608 such amounts as may be necessary for the fiscal year ending
3609 September 30, 2027, to the Retirement Systems of Alabama from
3610 the Senior Services Trust Fund to comply with Section
3611 41-15C-1, Code of Alabama 1975.
3612 Section 8. In addition to all other appropriations
3613 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
3614 such amounts as may be necessary for public funds transferred
3615 into the State Treasury, in accordance with Executive Order
3616 No. 726.
3617 Section 9. In addition to all other appropriations
3618 heretofore or hereafter made, there is hereby conditionally
3619 appropriated any and all amounts from tobacco settlement or
3620 litigation for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. The
3621 amounts are conditioned upon the State of Alabama receiving
3622 revenue from tobacco settlement or litigation and upon the
3623 recommendation of the Director of Finance, the Chairs of the
Page 128

recommendation of the Director of Finance, the Chairs of the
SB146 Enrolled
3624 House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate
3625 Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee, and the approval
3626 of the Governor. The conditional appropriation made herein
3627 shall be allocated pursuant to Sections 41-10-620 through
3628 41-10-639 and Sections 41-15B-1 through 41-15B-8, Code of
3629 Alabama 1975.
3630 Section 10. Except as may be herein otherwise
3631 provided, amounts herein specifically appropriated shall be in
3632 lieu of the amounts heretofore provided or appropriated by law
3633 for such purposes. The amounts herein appropriated are the
3634 maximum amounts to be expended for the purposes herein
3635 designated and in no event shall the maximum expenditure
3636 provided for any items of expense exceed the amount allocated
3637 herein except as may be further provided for under this act,
3638 as provided in the Budget Management Act of 1976, Sections
3639 41-19-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975, and those
3640 appropriations herein made, except appropriations to the
3641 Alabama Alcoholic Beverage Control Board for the purchase of
3642 alcoholic beverages, are and shall be subject to the terms,
3643 conditions, provisions and limitations of Sections 41-4-80, et
3644 seq., Code of Alabama 1975, and the Budget Management Act of
3645 1976, Sections 41-19-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
3646 Section 11. Any surplus remaining in any appropriation
3647 herein made from the State General Fund to any office,
3648 department, bureau, board, commission, or agency may be
3649 transferred, on order of the Governor, to any other
3650 appropriation herein made from the State General Fund when
Page 129

appropriation herein made from the State General Fund when
SB146 Enrolled
3651 such appropriation to any office, department, bureau, board,
3652 commission, or agency is insufficient to pay salaries in that
3653 office, department, bureau, board, commission, or agency.
3654 Section 12. (a) In addition to appropriations herein
3655 made, all gifts, grants, insurance proceeds, contributions, or
3656 entitlements, in excess of the amount carried in this act,
3657 including grants by the Congress of the United States,
3658 municipalities, or counties, to any department, division,
3659 board, bureau, commission, agency, institution, office, or
3660 officer of the State of Alabama are hereby appropriated and,
3661 in the event the same are recurring, are reappropriated to
3662 such department, division, board, bureau, commission, agency,
3663 institution, office, or officer to be used only for the
3664 purpose or purposes for which the grant or contribution was or
3665 shall be made. Further, all state, county, municipal, and
3666 educational entities are authorized to disburse such sums as
3667 deemed necessary by mutual agreement among said entities, the
3668 State of Alabama, and the Department of Examiners of Public
3669 Accounts to partially defray the cost of auditing services
3670 performed by said agency. All such sums are hereby
3671 appropriated and reappropriated if necessary to the Department
3672 of Examiners of Public Accounts for audit services, to be
3673 expended through the fund established by Section 41-5A-22,
3674 Code of Alabama 1975.
3675 (b) Provided, however, this section shall not apply to
3676 the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund or the Coronavirus
3677 Capital Projects Fund provided by the Congress of the United
Page 130

Capital Projects Fund provided by the Congress of the United
SB146 Enrolled
3678 States to the State of Alabama from the American Rescue Plan
3679 Act of 2021, except for any balance of such funds remaining
3680 from any appropriations made for fiscal year 2026 that remain
3681 unspent at the end of fiscal year 2026 shall be reappropriated
3682 for the same purposes originally appropriated.
3683 (c) This section shall not apply to any additional
3684 federal stimulus funds provided to the state in fiscal year
3685 2027 for purposes directly related to the coronavirus
3686 pandemic, other than additional funds provided for existing
3687 federal programs.
3688 (d) This section shall also not apply to funds from
3689 the Rural Health Transformation Program established by Public
3690 Law 119-21.
3691 Section 13. The Department of Examiners of Public
3692 Accounts is hereby authorized to examine as deemed necessary
3693 all appropriations herein made for compliance with the laws of
3694 the State of Alabama. Any examination performed shall be in
3695 accordance with the provisions of Title 41, Chapter 5A, Code
3696 of Alabama 1975. It is the intent of the Legislature that all
3697 state agencies cooperate with the Examiners of Public Accounts
3698 to provide the information necessary to conduct recovery
3699 audits as provided for in Section 41-5A-6, Code of Alabama
3700 1975.
3701 Section 14. Upon certification to the Director of
3702 Finance by the State Attorney General that a federal court has
3703 ordered the State of Alabama to pay claims, attorney fees, or
3704 other costs relating to said court order, funds are hereby
Page 131

other costs relating to said court order, funds are hereby
SB146 Enrolled
3705 appropriated to the affected department, board, bureau, or
3706 commission from the appropriate fund or funds of such
3707 department, board, bureau, or commission in the amount
3708 necessary to satisfy that court order. Such appropriations are
3709 in addition to any other appropriation heretofore or hereafter
3710 made in this appropriation act. Such appropriations are
3711 conditioned upon the availability of funds and a determination
3712 by the Director of Finance that existing appropriations are
3713 not available for the court-ordered payments.
3714 Section 15. All interest earned from funds paid into
3715 Account No. 0396 by Act 87-761, Act 88-947, Act 89-79, Act
3716 90-556, and Act 91-572 are hereby appropriated to the
3717 Governor's Contingency Fund to be spent at the discretion of
3718 the Governor. Any other interest earned by the state from
3719 Revenue Sharing Investments under the State and Local Fiscal
3720 Assistance Act of 1972, as amended, Public Law 92-512, 92nd
3721 Congress, together with any accruals or reversions thereon are
3722 hereby appropriated to the State General Fund.
3723 Section 16. Upon certification to the Director of
3724 Finance by the Director of the Alabama Emergency Management
3725 Agency that a disaster related expenditure was necessary to
3726 ensure life, safety, and incident stabilization for the State
3727 of Alabama as a result of an all hazard event, to include
3728 natural and man-made hazards, funds are hereby appropriated to
3729 the affected department from the State General Fund or any
3730 other fund necessary to satisfy the expenditure. Such
3731 appropriations are in addition to any other appropriation
Page 132

appropriations are in addition to any other appropriation
SB146 Enrolled
3732 heretofore and hereafter made in this appropriation act. Such
3733 appropriations are conditioned upon the availability of funds
3734 and a determination by the Director of Finance that existing
3735 appropriations are not available for the disaster related
3736 expense.
3737 Section 17. All encumbered balances of a previous
3738 fiscal year appropriation, other than the exclusions
3739 authorized by this act or in Section 41-4-93, Code of Alabama
3740 1975, shall lapse no later than September 30 of the fiscal
3741 year immediately following the fiscal year for which the
3742 appropriation was made and shall revert to the credit of the
3743 State General Fund or earmarked fund from which the
3744 appropriation or appropriations were made.
3745 Section 18. The appropriations made herein to the
3746 departments, boards, offices, commissions, and agencies
3747 include the amounts necessary, and said departments, boards,
3748 offices, commissions, and agencies are hereby directed to make
3749 the transfer of funds to the State Personnel Department in
3750 said amounts enumerated in this act. All agencies enumerated
3751 in this act and receiving services from other governmental
3752 agencies enumerated in this act shall make full payment in a
3753 timely manner for such services.
3754 Section 19. All funds collected under Section
3755 40-12-43.1, Code of Alabama 1975, between the effective date
3756 of Act 98-191 and September 30, 2026, are hereby appropriated
3757 to the Auburn University Center for Governmental Services for
3758 the administration of the examiner certification program
Page 133

the administration of the examiner certification program
SB146 Enrolled
3759 established by the Alabama Local Tax Institute of Standards
3760 and Training as provided in Section 40-12-43.1, Code of
3761 Alabama 1975.
3762 Section 20. It is the intent of the Legislature that
3763 the funds appropriated to the Office of the Senate President
3764 Pro Tempore in subsection 6 of Section 3 of this act which are
3765 not otherwise designated may be expended by the Senate
3766 President Pro Tempore for the same purposes as are authorized
3767 for the Lieutenant Governor pursuant to Section 29-4-50, Code
3768 of Alabama 1975, and the Speaker of the House of
3769 Representatives pursuant to Section 29-4-60, Code of Alabama
3770 1975.
3771 Section 21. The appropriations made herein to the
3772 departments, boards, offices, commissions, and agencies
3773 include the amounts necessary to pay the SEIB. The SEIB rate
3774 shall be $1,175 per month for each full-time employee for the
3775 fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. In addition to the
3776 amounts otherwise appropriated in this act, there is hereby
3777 appropriated from the State General Fund in the same
3778 proportion as the salaries of the several State officials and
3779 employees are paid, additional amounts to pay for the increase
3780 in employer contributions to SEIB. The additional amounts
3781 appropriated in this section from the State General Fund shall
3782 not exceed $18,000,000 for the fiscal year ending September
3783 30, 2027. The Director of Finance shall ensure first priority
3784 shall be given to all State General Fund payrolls, including
3785 the payroll of the legislature. State agencies may receive
Page 134

the payroll of the legislature. State agencies may receive
SB146 Enrolled
3786 additional allocations from the appropriation made in this
3787 section from the State General Fund in amounts necessary to
3788 pay for the increase. The remainder of this appropriation from
3789 the State General Fund may be allocated by the Director of
3790 Finance to those agencies which receive transfers from the
3791 State General Fund. The SEIB shall adjust the insurance
3792 program wherever appropriate to maintain the aforementioned
3793 fixed rate.
3794 Section 22. It is the intent of the Legislature that
3795 the Director of Finance shall notify the Chair of the House
3796 Ways and Means-General Fund Committee, the Chair of the Senate
3797 Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee, and the
3798 Legislative Fiscal Officer of any interagency transfers, of
3799 any type, including contracting, of any of the funds
3800 appropriated in this act.
3801 Section 23. All nongovernmental entities, identified
3802 by the Legislative Services Agency, which are allocated funds
3803 in Section 3 of this act shall file a report with the Chair of
3804 the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee, Chair of the
3805 Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-General Fund, Finance
3806 Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer prior to the
3807 start of the 2027 Regular Session, regarding the proposed
3808 expenditures and usage of the funds appropriated in the fiscal
3809 year ending September 30, 2027. The Legislative Services
3810 Agency shall provide notice to the identified nongovernmental
3811 entities within 60 days following enactment of this act
3812 regarding the reporting requirements and the methodology to
Page 135

regarding the reporting requirements and the methodology to
SB146 Enrolled
3813 submit reports and format to be used, which may include an
3814 online platform.
3815 Section 24. (a) Any state agency providing direct
3816 assistance or support to local governments from state funds
3817 appropriated in this act shall file a report with the Chair of
3818 the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee, the Chair of
3819 the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-General Fund,
3820 Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer prior to
3821 the start of the 2027 Regular Session, regarding the cost of
3822 the assistance provided with state funds and the amount of
3823 local contribution. The agencies shall also provide copies of
3824 any MOUs between the state agency and the local government.
3825 (b) The Department of Finance shall provide notice to
3826 all state agencies of the requirements of this section.
3827 Section 25. If any section, paragraph, sentence,
3828 clause, provision, or portion of this act or all or any
3829 portion of any appropriations herein made be held
3830 unconstitutional or invalid, it shall not affect any other
3831 section, paragraph, sentence, clause, provision, or portion of
3832 this act or any other appropriation or appropriations or
3833 portion thereof hereby made not in and of itself
3834 unconstitutional or invalid.
3835 Section 26. All laws or parts of laws, general,
3836 special, private, or local that are in conflict with or
3837 inconsistent with the provisions of this act are hereby
3838 expressly repealed.
3839 Section 27. Each agency of the state funded through
Page 136

Section 27. Each agency of the state funded through
SB146 Enrolled
3840 the provisions of this act shall provide an equal opportunity
3841 for employment and business opportunities for all citizens of
3842 this state without regard to sex or race.
3843 Section 28. This act shall become effective October 1,
3844 2026.
Page 137

2026.
SB146 Enrolled
3845
3846
3847
3848
3849
3850
3851 ________________________________________________
3852 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
3853
3854
3855
3856 ________________________________________________
3857 Speaker of the House of Representatives
3858
3859
3860 SB146
3861 Senate 11-Mar-26
3862 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
3863 the Senate, as amended.
3864
3865 Patrick Harris,
3866 Secretary.
3867
3868
3869
3870
3871 House of Representatives
3872 Amended and passed: 01-Apr-26
3873
3874
3875
3876
3877 Senate concurred in House amendment 08-Apr-26
3878
3879
3880
3881
3882 By: Senator Albritton
Page 138